Drupal
    Drupal is content management system which came in year 2001 for developing dynamic websites 
    Drupal is CMS with tens and thousands of add-on features 

What is CMS?
    In old days we would create webpage files that interlinked between each other using HTML, upload them to the internet and we have 10 or 100 or 1000 pages on website, but each page was its own separate file, but it is not the efficient way to manage a large website
    CMS that comes along and says, when you come to a webpage and click on a link, the first thing that happens is CMS which in our case is Drupal which made up of PHP, Ajax, JS and brings will all kinds of functionality, so we want the content from this particular area of the website and all of the content is stored in a database. So when we want that content to have particular look and style, so Drupal will have a database that contains the content and the theme that holds all of the look and feel and design of our site
     So when someone says that we have updated our logo and we need to update thousand pages on ur website, so CMS like Drupal says we will update in one place and ur entire site would be updated in an instant 

Drupal History
     Drupal is open source so therefore Drupal is free. Drupal was founded in 2000 by Dries Buytaert 

2000 - A chat platform in a Dorm room
2001 - 1.0,2.0,3.0
2002 - 4.0
2007 - 5.0 - stable version of Drupal released
2008 - 6.0
2011 - 7.0
2015 - 8.0
2020 - 9.0

Drupal has become core CMS that has add-ons called modules and themes, they can be all packaged up into Distributions and there is huge community around drupal
    whitehouse, weather.com, harvard university , dallas cowboys, lady gaga uses Drupal 

Why Drupal?
1. It is free and completely open source project with some incredibly powerful features
2. It is flexible - Drupal is one of adaptive systems. Drupal works with sophisticated websites that require many different custom types, developers use it as both a CMS and as a web development platform 
3. It is mobile ready - we can view and administer every page on drupal site from any device we choose 
4. Fantastic for big projects from whitehosue.gov to weather.com, drupal can handle ur biggest project. Drupal shines with more complex websites, its great solution for the people who want to build feature rich website, and its great solution for large enterprises 
5. Friendly, Social and Searchable - Drupal helps people to find my site and my content, also drupal allows site editors to add tags, descriptions, keywords and human friendly urls
6. Safe and secure - Drupal keeps ur sites afe with regular security updates like hash passwords, session id's thet change when permissions change, text format permissions, restricting user input etc 
7. If we need to extend ur drupal site from what comes out of the box, there are 1000 and 1000 of modules that add features to ur drupal site, we can have multiple themes or versions of themes on same site and we have complete control over the visual presentation of website data
8. Drupal have active support community 


Many refer Drupal as CMS or framework and drupal.org states that drupal can be used to build anything from a personal blog to an enterprise appl. When we think about drupal we typically think about open source code that when combined makes up drupal, this code includes drupal code where we get when we download drupal from drupal.org and contributed modules and themes 
    Drupal is more than code, it is international community of people to share ideas, help each other, work together to improve the internet, one contribution at a time. Drupal is web development framework 

Drupal Installation
     Drupal needs AMP(Apache, MySQL and PHP) stack or similar to run Drupal, there are other webservers and database options for running drupal but these are recommenended once and simpler to start 
    In order to run drupal on local system or webserver, it need to run on AMP stack or similar. Many users develop on linux use virtual box setup, in case of MAC or windows user which use MAMP(My Apache+Mysql+PHP) OR XAMPP which is other tool used to run apache, mysql, php on ur loacl computer 

XAMPP/WAMP/MAMP/LAMP
   - Apache
   - MySQL
   - PHP
   - W: Windows
   - M: MacOS
   - L: Linux
- We use XAMPP as local env

1. Install XAMPP
  start apache, mysql in xampp panel
     -If mysql is already installed on 3306, stop the service which is running from services.msc and then start it
     - Click Netstat give > apache2 -v, if it is not responding it is problem with port no
     - Goto xamp/apache/conf/httpd.conf - edit 
Listen 8012
ServerName localhost:8012
     - Now start Apache

2. localhost:8012/phpmyadmin - It will start the php admin page

3. Install composer from https://getcomposer.org/doc/00-intro.md#installation-linux-unix-macos

4. check cmd prompt 
>composer

5. Download Drupal9 from https://www.drupal.org/download - click download.tar.gz

6. Extract drupal9 inside xampp-htdocs-Drupal9.3.6-Rename to demo1

7. Run localhost:8012/demo1
       - Choose language: English, so that admin interface will be in english language 
       - Installation Profile: Standard for majority of the sites we develop, minimal for advance users and we intend to customize the drupal site we are setting up 
       - Click Continue anyway
       - Now goto htdocs/demo1/sites/default/settings.php file
            Here in $databases:[] is empty
  -Set up database - This is where verification requirment happens on backend side and it just making sure that the env we have setup is capable of running drupal site. Drupal is CMS  and as such it needs a place to store that content and store the activity that happens with that content
   Some configuration element is also stored in drupal database, one of difference between drupal 7 and drupal 8 is that drupal 8 has taken some of the configuration settings out of being installed in database and put them into the code. We need to connect to database before we continue, the database has already have been setup whenever we set the environment, so we need to configure it 
       - Database name: demo1
         username: root
         Password: empty password 
       - Now goto localhost:8012/phpmyadmin, it will create demo1 db with some default tables 
       - Now goto htdocs/demo1/sites/default/settings.php file
            Here in $databases:will be created based on configuration given 

8. Now the drupal site is installed and we need to setup basic configuration settings for the site before we move on and start working with customization 
Site name: Tasty Cakes for All 
    - what is this site is for, in our case if ur company is called Tasty Cakes for All, so we provide sitename as Tasty Cakes for All, which provide worshops on methods for creating treats with consideration for food allergies and sensitives. It also provide a database that contributed to invite individual who might have valuable recepies to share 

Site email address: communications@tastycakesforall.com
   It is system email address  

Site maintenance account: 
Username: tc4a
     It is critical user on site, mostly user1. user1 is always powerful account on ur site, this is the user which can do anything including serious harm to the site. It is also good idea that user account should not have username as "admin" because this is most likely username that the user account will be on any content management site and so its the one hacker will try to attempt to get into the site 

Password: password
Email address: siteadmin@tastycakesforall.com
    This is the email address that will be used, if we forget the user account password and need to have password resets 

Regional settings:
    All of the info we setup in this configuration is changeable later on (ie) if we want to change the email address or sitename or username or password. Regional settings is also changeable later on, however its the one section that we really want to get correct when u first install drupal site, because consider if we have any content on ur site (ie) date or time sensitive we want to make sure that date and times on the content are in the region that ur site events will actually be with them 
    If we change regional settings after date and time content is created, it is possible that ur configuration will become little bit messy and we have to go back and troubleshoot 
   Default country: India
   Default Time zone: Kolkatta

Update Notifications:
    This can also be changed later on in this process

9.Click Save and continue
     It will automatically take to home page of our new site. On top of site we have black bar and grey bar which give access to all kind of site configuration to us, this and all available to us because we logged in to as tc4a user which is user1 account 

10. Open new ignoito window and run, localhost:8012/tc4a
    When working on drupal site, it is often helpful to open sites in 2 different browsers, one in which we are logged in and one in an anonymous user and make easier in catch errors and settings of the machines 
    When we open the site in different browser, the site works differently, first on left side we dont have search bar, no add content link, on top the admin bars are not available. This is the very helpful way to develop specially once we start getting into setting permission over for different user experiences and if we have multiple user roles not just anonymous and administrator, we may choose to have 5 or 6 different browsers on ur computer and actually look at the site as different users 

    Drupal is CMS with the database and user accounts that allows human being to authenticate and make changes to the site 

Directory structure of Drupal tar file downloaded
    Each dir in drupal folder will contain readme.txt which contain information about what to do and what the directory and how to treat it contents 

1. core - It is the core code for ur drupal site is stored, we should not edit anything in this directory. We need to replace the contents of the dir when doing drupal core security update 
2. modules - we place contrib modules that u download to extend the functionality of drupal site 
3. profiles dir is available because drupal community has created number of installation profiles that includes preconfigured and customized elements for drupal to fill the specific solutions. For example we have profiles for commerce, profiles for goverence and profiles for many other types of sites that you want 
4. themes - we store any contributed themes that we download from drupal.org or any custom theme that we built yourself 
5. sites - This dir is crucial to ur site when we develop multisites. If we are running only one site from ur codebase, then we primarlily work with default dir inside sites directory 
    Here we have settings.php and default-settings.php file. settings.php file will contain all of info that our sites needs to run, including the database info 
    files directory will contain all of temporary files for ur sites such as images, pdfs and cache files. We cant see anything but we can see in existing file
    Once ur site is installed, if we open demo1/sites/default/files we can see config followed by hash code, this is where all the configuration changes made to the site will be stored 

Content Types - Content and Articles 
     We discuss basic contents and articles which comes with drupal, what makes drupal as CMS as web appl framework is the ability to customize everything
     So when we first install drupal we end up with front page and configuration options, the front page says "Welcome to Tasty Cakes for All" and on the top we can see configuration options. The most important configuration on ur site is content entry, without content ur site proably dosent serve much of the purpose
       Since we have currently logged in as administrator so we have admin menu in top which cays Manage, Shortcuts and our user name . The "Manage" tab shows all of configuration access that we have on our site, starting with content

Creating Article:
1. Click content 
2. Click Add Content
       We have 2 options available to us by default (ie) article and Basic page 
3. Click Article 
       Title:  Gluten Sensitivity
       Body: Paste some dummy content 
       Tags: gluten-free, baked goods
       Image: stickybuns.jpg
Once we add image, we get alt text feild, this is very important that we always fill alt text field on any piece of content when we add image, because this is the text that readers and search engines will recieve in the event when image is not available 
       Alternate text: delicious sticky buns
4. Click Save and Publish 

Now we can see Glutten Sensivity article page and we can see images, when it is submitted, who submitted, the image, the tags and also comment field, since this particular content type has comment enabled by default 

5. Now we click home page on top, now we have piece of content on front page and this piece of content is an article that we just create. 
    It displays the smaller version of the image and teaser

Creating basic page:
1. Click content 
2. Click Add Content
3. Click Basic Page - basic pages are for static content that wont change 
       Title: About Tasty Cakes for All
       Body: Paste some dummy data
       Click Menu Settings 
         - Click Provide a menu link 
                 Menu Link Title:  About
                 Parent Item: Main Navigation
4. Click Save and Publish 

Now we can see just a page without any comment field, no date and time, no author info. On the top we can see the menu navigation "About" and "Home"
    This shows how much we can create with drupal out of box without doing any customization error 
         
Publishing options in Drupal 
         This options dicates how and where ur contents should displays and all of this options are completely customizable with the configuration
         For example, complex appl wordpress are possible in which we might require content to go through some kind of approval process before it is visible to public.
         Here we are going to add piece of content which is article and this time we are not going to follow the default settings all the way through

1. Click Content
2. Click Add Content
3. Click Article
      Title: Peanut as a substitute for Eggs
      Body: paste some dummy content
      Tags: gluten-free, baked goods, peanut, egg-free
      Image: pg-cookies.jpg
      Alternate text: Peanut butter cookies look very moist even without eggs 
4. Click Save and Uncheck Published check box 
         Now we can see article will display in pink shade of background which indicate this piece of content is unpublished, so it wont show up in any of the displays 
5. Now copy the url and paste in new ignioto window, now it will not display because this content is not published 
     
6. Now goto Content - Peanut as a subsitute for Eggs - Click Edit button which will be seen since we have logged in as user 
    On right side it says "Not Published" and give the timestamp of last time this content is saved 

7. Click Comment settings
       We have open so users can post comments and closed where users cannot post comments. Since this piece of content is about Peanut as subsititude for eggs and we dont want this post to be discussed more, so we click "Close" for this content 

8. Click Authoring Information
       We have options to change username of the author for particular content and to change when this particular piece of content is created. This is useful if we are putting content for someone else or if content probably should have published earlier than actually putting it on the site
       We can leave the authorname and timestamp as such since we have only one user 

9. Check "Published" and Click Save, so that the content will be published in the site and we can see the comments are disabled and 
    We can login into new incognito window and check the content is display, also Click "Home" page and check whether both contents displayed

10. If we want "Glutten Sensivity" article to be at the top, right now it is after "Peanut as a substitute for Eggs" article 

Click Glutten Sensivity article - Click Edit - Click Promotion Options - Click Sticky at top of lists - Click Save - Click Home menu in the top
     Now Glutten Sensivity article will move to the top and looks different because this particular article has been deemed special 

11. Click "About" menu
         Now we can see url for about page as "http://localhost:8012/tc4a/node/2"
         By default all content in drupal will have node id which is a unique number assigned to each content in ur site, so that it can be referenced by the machine 
      Click Edit - Cick URL Path Settings 
URL alias: /about
     Click Save

Now when we see URL it will be changed as "http://localhost:8012/tc4a/about"

Still now we have covered, drupal content types called pages and articles, we also have publishing options by default to these content types and those publishing options are determine how and where the content created in this content type. So pages meant for static content, by default pages dont have comments, no images, no tags and they can easily placed in menu system
     Articles are meant for temporary items like news, blogs etc, by default articles have comments, it asks for images, tags and also displays on front page by default, in front page it will show the summary not the entire content. Any content on the site can be either published or unpublished. When the content is not published, it is not visible to public and typically displays with pink background behind the content area, in order to allow to know that this particular content is not published 
    The editing feature provide access to different promotion controls like we can change authoring information so we can set the content is being authored by different user on different date and time. We can also change the url of content to give friendly path. If the content has commenting available too, then we can determine whether or not the comments to be open or closed. We can also set promotions options for particular content to determine whether or not to show in front page or sticky which means regardless of whatever other options are present in view, the sticky items will come to top


Site Information for Drupal site
    This includes sitename, slogan, system email address, settings for front page, access denied and page not found page 

1. Click Configuration - Under System Click Site Information 
     We set some of info while installing drupal and now we expand further 

Site name: Tasty Cakes for All
Email Address: communications@tastyakesforall.com
      This is original email address for any communication that needs to send out from site such as password reset and some other notification 
Slogan: A source for information on food sensitivities 

Front page:
We also have ability to change the url for the front page (ie) when somebody comes to ur website and type top level domain tastycakesforall.com, they will get one page which is ur home page or front page. So just like anyother page on ur site actually has its own node or url 

Error Pages:
    Default 403 page is the page that user is going to see, if they land on the page for which they dont have permission to view the content 
    Default 404 page means the url that we enter doesnt have any destination  

When we save and go back to site, we can see the slogan would display in web page 

2. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Basic Page
Title: Sorry, this isnt for you!
Body: I dont think you came here intentionally, so I will not get mad. Please turn around!

Click URL Path Settings
URL alias: /403
Click Save

3. Now configure access denied and error page in site Configuration
Click Configuration - Click Site Information - 

Default 403 page: /403

For 404 error page we actually direct the user to default system search to drupal site (ie) search/node so if the page is not found then the user is automatically directed to search/node

Default 404 page: /search/node

4. Now we run localhost:8012/tc4a/abc, then it will automatically open default search page 

5. Now we open new incognito window and try to access http://localhost:8012/tc4a/abc2, it will go to accessdenied page since we dont login into the page 


Navigation toolbar
    It is the toolbar at the top of site which gives access to all of the configuration option available in Drupal installation
    Navigation toolbar is black menu which we can see in the top of site when we logged in as administrator user. There are 4 options available in navigation toolbar like Manage, shortcuts, username and toggle option on right side

1. When we click on that toggle option, we can see pencil icon will be appearing all over the interface. This is called quick edit and gives u access to edit ur content inline and we can do changes without going away from home page 

2. Manage
      When we select Manage option, the bar underneath will show Content, Structure, Appearance, Extend, Configuration, People, Report, Help 

1. Content
       Content section gives u the ability to add contents, it also gives the ability to look at existing content and go through that existing content in different ways. We have 2 other tabs called Files and Comments
     Files will give u access to anything thats been uploaded to the sites such as image, pdf or other file type that u have been accepting and we can use this to manage those files or atleast to find out where they are used in ur sites 
    Comments tab allows you to access comments on ur sites and to find out any comments need to be reviewed or approved and also to find out which content, a comment exists on and also who authored that comment and when the comment was made 

2. Structure - building block of ur site 
       It gives access to heart of our drupal site, the ability to change apperance on ur site, we can create our own custom content types and those forms will look different from article and basic page content types 

1. Block layout 
       It gives you access to add or change the blocks on ur site and place them in various regions. So blocks are chunks of content or  information or embedded code on ur site that are separate from content itself 

2. Comment types
       It is used to change comment forms, we can create comment form which ask user for various specific type of information 

3. Contact forms
       We can setup specific forms that can be used to contact someone through ur site. For example we might have book or services form on ur site and we might use contact form to do that

4. Content types
       We create custom content types for ur site and we can customize ur drupal site  

5. Display mode
        This is powerful element of ur structure options in ur configuration, because this gives the ability to setup how ur content will displayed and create different displays for different purpose 

6. Menus
      This is ur site navigation, we can also add links and change order of items in menus

7. Taxonomy
       This is the tool for characterization of content and very useful for setting up searching and for optimizing search engines and for creating navigation system for ur site which make it easy for user to find information that they looking for 

8. Views
     Views are the heart of how ur content gets displayed on ur site. Views are queries that list out content based on various specific parameters and really important for making ur content easy to find and providing logical structure for ur site 

3. Appearance
       It is the place where we manage themes, other CMS refer themes as skins or designs. It is used to control ur layout 
      We can see Bartik is the default theme and Seven would be for admin theme. Here only we control the contributed themes or custom themes we have installed at ur site 
      We have Settings tab which controls the display of some key elements in ur theme 

4. Extend
       It is used to add new module or enable modules that are part of core but disabled in default installation. We can also used to update module if there is security update and uninstall module that we decide to that we are not going to use it 

5. Configuration
       This is where we are going to setup overall settings for ur drupal site like site title or caching settings on ur site such as performance settings. This is also way we can setup profile systems settings and text format that are available to content editors 

6. People
     Not only as this way we are going to manage the users that have access to ur site, its also a way we are going to set permissions for those users can do and we are going to set user roles
     Permission setting are based on user roles, an individual users are signed user roles so that they can have access to the permissions designed for that specific roles

7. Reports 
      It give you access to status reports on ur site including updates available or log messages. If we are seeing lot of issues with ur site, we may look at the log messages to help u identify all those issues are coming from, so that we can fix them 

8. Help 
      It gives access to lot of documentation, this documentation is created by the community and it is a great place for u to get started as a community contributer because as u r working on ur drupal site, u may find that some documentation is in quite helpful as u needed to be and u on ur own can figure out the solution to something that might be missing and once that happen we can go back into documentation urself and update the documentation so that it can be more helpful for next person who comes along and has same experience as u might have had 


Shortcuts
    This gives u quick access to sections of manage area that u might want to spend lot of time in. By default it has Add Content and All Content, because basically we spend lot of time with our content 

User Account(tc4a)
     It is the user account, this gives the ability to view, edit user profile and logout 


Customizing Shortcuts 
     To make it easy and quickly get to the choices that u need to use most frequently 
 
1. Click Shortcuts, we can see Add Content and All Content which by default included in drupal installation 

2. Now in this case we want to generate shortcut for comments page
    Click Content - Goto Comments tab - we can see star like symbol near comment, if u click that it will added as shortcut in the shortcut tab
    Click Shortcuts and check whether comment is added as shortcut 

3. We can also create custom shortcut menus for different type of users on ur site. For example we have content editor user role and we have a user specifically for comment approval then we can have shortcut menus that specifically focusses on content editing and other shortcut menu that specifically focus on comment management

1. Click Edit Shortcuts - Click Shortcuts under breadcrumbs - Click Add Shortcut set 
Set name: comment management shortcuts
Machine readable name: coment-mgt-shortcut
Click Save

Click Shortcuts under breadcrumbs 

Now we can see 2 shortcut sets have been created, if we click List Links on Default, it shows shortcuts for Add Comment, All Comment and Comments. If we click List links on comment management shortcuts again we can see shortcuts for Add Comment, All Comment and Comments, because we created shortcut set and copied everything from default which is the starting point for any new shortcut set 
    But now we dont comments shortcut on default set, so we go into default set and remove the comments shortcut 

2. Now we go to our user account(tc4a)
Click Edit profile - Click Shortcuts tab - Select comment management shortcut - Click Change set 

Now we can see for tc4a user we will have "comment management shortcut" as shortcut set so we can see Add Content, All Content and Comments as shortcuts for this particular user 


Regional Language Setting
      This settings will tell ur site where u have located geographically which is helpful when u have map based information on ur site 

1. Click Configuration - Click Regional Settings under Regional and Languages
    We can see here what we setup during ur installation process, so we are telling ur site where u r located, what is ur timezone and also we can determine whether or not users can able to setup own time zones 
   So if ur site needs to be international or needs to span many locations across the country that have different timezones then we can actually allow users to adjust time in their timezones 

2. Click Date and Time format under Regional and Languages 
     Now we can see all of date and time formats that exists and we can create custom format also 

Click Add Format
Name: Time Only
Format String: g:H a   ---- When we add format string which requires PHP to identify the format string to look like. If we dont know the format we can click PHP Manual and get the actual format 

Now we can see custom format has been added and use it later in our site

3. We know that this particular site  needs to be a multilingual site, so we want to extend our site to be multilingual. Language is one of option that comes with Drupal installation, but it is not enabled functionality since many sites dont need to be multilingual 

1. Click Extend - Select Language module - Click Install
2. Click Configuration - Now we can see Language option under Regional and Language, since we enabled Language module 
3. Click Languages 
      Now we can see only language available is English, because thats only we used at installing the site. But we want traditional chinese available to this site as well, because we want chinese people also want to use this site just like English people 
4. Click Add Language - Select Chinese, Traditional - Click Add Language 
     Now drupal will install that language and make it available to ur drupal site. We can also set which language is default, in this case we keep english as default language because that is going to be the primary user language on this site
5. Click Detection and Selection tab - which allows to choose how a language is detected so that the content or interface language that presented to the user is appropriate to that particular user 

6. Click Content Language under Regional and Languages
     We can make translation available to different types of content on the site 
Select Content - Click Save Configuration 

7. We can also set date and time formats to be available to specific language

Click Date and Time formats - Edit Time_only 

Now we can see new field with language selection, so we can make this format only to english or chinese or not specified or not applicable, so this date and time format can be used in specific language 

7. When we are visiting configuration section in menubar, we can see an error message as "One or more problems were detected with your Drupal installation. Check the status report for more information"
   Click Status Report - We can see the problem as "Trusted Host settings" is not enabled 

This status report is also helpful, it also gives u an idea of whats wrong and where we can find out the information about how to fix it 

1. Now we will go to settings.php inside sites/default folder

2. Now we paste the following code in end of file
$settings['trusted_host_patterns'] = [
    '^localhost$',
]; 

3. We dont have permission to edit settings.php, so we change permissions on default directory and settings.php

- Open Git bash
- sites>chmod 777 default/
- sites>cd default
- default>chmod 777 settings.php

4. Reload the page, now we see trusted host is enabled and there is no error in status report 


Entities and Nodes
      Drupal is complex framework that has entire vocabulary that goes with it, understanding that vocabulary makes it easier to get help, to make use of educational resources that are available and also to navigate text as you are learning Drupal. One page that u should always be handy while u becoming Drupal site builder or developer is the glossary page on Drupal.org

Entity
    - Any defined chunk of data in Drupal. This includes things like nodes, users, taxonomy terms, files, etc. Contributed modules can define custom entities. Each entity type can have multiple bundles.
    - The best explanation that we can think of to explain this is, how instagram sends data directly to Facebook 
    Consider we have a photo with description of that photo, we also have comments along with the photo and information on when it is posted and who have posted. All of this bits of info or chunks of data that make up this specific instagram post, and this post as a whole is called entity. It also has a internal entity within it which is the image itself 
    If we go to facebook, we have instagram account set to automatically post to facebook as well. So this image, the date when it was posted, the caption and all of that information is automatically push over to facebook, because facebook knows how to understand that entity 
    Entities can also be bundles which are specific implementations of an entity type. So when u send instagram post is a bundle which sends over to facebook 

1. Now we go to drupal site, where we can see 2 entities (ie) 2 article which is a content, we can also see 2 more entities which are the two images associated with each of these articles and those entities are files
    If we look at "submitted by" information, we can see it is submitted by "tc4a" which is the user that currently logged in and who created these content. That user and any other user on this site is also an entity. Underneath the images, we can see tags and comments, so those tags and comments are also called as entities. Each of these things that exists on the site is chunk of content that define in a very specific way 

Nodes
    A piece of content in Drupal, typically corresponding to a single page on the site. Nodes are specific kind of entity and all the content enter on to the site like articles, basic pages those are going to be the nodes 

1. Now go to Drupal site - Click Content
      We have 3 items which is called as node, each one of these items will also have a specific node id, by default that node id will be end of the url on that specific node
     When we click "Peanut as a Subsitute for Eggs", in the url we can see "/node/3", where 3 is the node id for this specific content and that node id will be unique for each and every content in ur site
     So no matter what content type we are using, it will become a node and those content types are basic page and article

Creating content type with basic pages
      We will create content that comes with drupal installation (ie) basic page content. The content we create using this content type will be drupal nodes and we will create this content usinf 3 different ways, so that we can review the differences between the contents display with different choices in the settings

1. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Basic page 
Title: Why Tasty Cakes?
Body: some dummy text

Now we want this in main menu, so we go Menu Setting - Select Provide a menu link 

URL alias: /why
Click Save 

2. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Basic page 
Title: A Celiac's Story 
Body: some dummy text

Now we want this in main menu but we are not going to put in top level, we want as a sub page for why tasty cakes page, so we go Menu Setting - Select Provide a menu link 

Parent item :  Why Tasty Cakes?
Uncheck Published
Click Save 

Now we can see this page is not published and will come with pink background indicate that this content is not published 

Now when u copy the url "http://localhost:8012/tc4a/node/6" and paste in another browser, it will go to access denied page as it is not published 

3. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Basic page 
Title: A Nursing Mom's Story?
Body: some dummy text

Now we want this in main menu, so we go Menu Setting - Select Provide a menu link 

Parent item :  Why Tasty Cakes?

Click Promotion Options - Select Promoted to first page 

Click Save 

Now we can this content, when we go to home page, we can see this content displays on the home page and we can see it displays differently how articles displays. It dosent have submitted by, tags and comments information because it is different type of contents 

4. Click Content
       Now we can see 3 basic pages we just created, we can see information about those pages including one of them is unpublished and also see those pages behave differently (ie) one of them display on front page and others are simply found through menu system 

Creating content type with articles 
      Articles are temporary content like blog post, new items which have tags, comments. The content we create as articles will be drupal nodes because a node is piece of content in drupal site. We create article using 3 different settings so that we can see the difference between how they behave 

1. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Article
Title: Adventures in Sticky Dough
Body: some dummy text 
Tags: gluten-free, baking
Comment Settings: open 
Promotion Options: Disable Promoted to first page
- Click Save 

We can see articles with comments, but when we click on home page we wont see that article in our list of content because it is note promoted to front page 

2. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Article
Title: Exploring Spices
Body: some dummy text 
Tags: spices
Image: spices.jpg
Alternate text: Spices are colorful
Promotion Options: Check Sticky at top of lists
URL alias: /spices
Comment settings: closed 
- Click Save 

Now we can see this article will have an image but does not have comments and if we goto the home page this article is sticky so it is at very top 

3. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Article
Title: The Myth of Healthy 
Body: some dummy text 
Tags: gluten-free, health food
Image: myth.jpg
Alternate text: Myth of Healthy
Authoring Information:
    Now we want to add author info because this shouldnt be the first article posted and we have number of articles already and this is not first one
Authored on: 02/02/2022 - we change date to some earlier date (ie) we have posted the article today but it think that article is posted while ago
- Uncheck Published
- Click Save 

Now we can see the article with pink background since it is unpublished 


So here we created 3 content types called article and those 3 articles have different settings, one didnt have image and wasnt promoted to front page, one of them has alias and was promoted to front page and 3rd article is not published so the public wouldnt able to see it and also have different date and time much earlier then when it was actually posted 

- Click Content - Now we can see all contents and these are nodes and many of these nodes have images attached to them
- Click Files tab - we can see all of the images that have been included on the content and we can find where those images has been used
   Click 1 Place under used in - It will tell what entity and what type of entity those particular files have been used in 


Content Revision
      The goal of CMS is to enable people of all different roles to easily edit content. In some sites this might need because 1000's of people are managing the content on the site and one person make changes that other dosent understand. When we edit a piece of content in drupal we can set it to store a revision 

1. Click About menu - Click Edit - We are going to change something in the body or format it 
   Select Create new revision checkbox
   Revision log message: Contents are highlighted
Click Save 

Now we can see the edited data and also revision tab and when we click on revision tab we can see the list of all the revisions of this particular content, we can also see the previous revision by clicking on the date and timestamp for that revision 

2. We have many options for filtering the contents in the content types based on type, title etc
   So we created 6 nodes among which 3 are basic page and 3 are articles. In case if we want publish the articles which is unpublished

Published status: unpublished - Click Filter - Select both the checkbox
   Action: Publish Content
   Click "Apply to selected items"

Drupal Blocks
     Blocks are building block that we can use to make ur site in our own ways. Some blocks are created by modules that we will enable and others are created by menus that we build and others are created by views that we build  
     In our page, search box is a block, tools box is a menu that displays as block, the content area on ur site is also block called as system block which is generated by Drupal core in order to display all of the key elements of Drupal site
     Blocks are displayed in regions on ur site, regions are layout area that are defined by theme, ur theme is the code that renders ur design. The different region we are looking at page which include left sidebar where search and tools box are present, content region where we can see articles and basic pages, header region where we have logo, slogan, sitename 

1. Click Structure - Click Block layout - Demonstrate block region(Bartik) 
    To view what are different blocks present in site

Block Management Page
     The block management page is accessed under Manage tab

1. Click Structure - Click Block layout 
           This page will list all available blocks, on the left we can see blocks placed in the region already and on the right we see blocks that are available but not placed
       We can see the blocks that are listed and we can see the regions in which they are displaying. 
       In sidebar first we can see multiple blocks in it, we can reorder the blocks by using the handlebars and drag the blocks up down and display in different order. 
    Previously we use drag handlebars to shift the block order, sometimes this drag handlebars may not be display due to many reasons like wrong versions of jquery or performance issues so everything on ur site is not loaded. In those cases or in case where u want to change the order without using drag handlebars then we can use row weights

1. Click Show row weights 
      Now we can notice drag handlebars disappear and new column called weight will be created
      Now we can see sidebar first, where we have actual weights displayed as -6, -5. As a general rule lighter something is higher falls and heavier it is then deeper sinks. So in this case the lighter item with higher negative weight will appear above the heavier items 
     Tools: 3
    Click Save

Now we can see search will appear above tools

2. Now we can move blocks from one region to another, for example breadcrumbs currently display in the region called Breadcrumb, but now we want to display in content region 
    - Now we drag breadcrumb and put into content region -  Click Save blocks
    - Now click Why Tasty Cakes? - we can see breadcrumbs are displaying in the content region

3. We have disabled region in the bottom, if the blocks are in the disabled region which means that they are not displaying in any region on the site 

4. Blocks layout will contain the blocks which already exist in the system, so some of the blocks which we have created, some of the blocks which are created by the menus or views and some of the blocks that exists because of system blocks when u install Drupal 
     These blocks are categorized based on how they have been generated, under Lists we have Recent comments, Recent Content and whos online, under menus we have administration, footer, main navigation, shortcuts, tools, user account menu, these are blocks that exists by default when u install drupal 
     We have system block called Powered by Drupal which is present in the bottom, but we place another Powered by Drupal block in the bottom of content region

- Drag Powered By Drupal and put in Content region 
- Click Save 


Creating Custom Block
     Consider we want to create quote on left sidebar throughout the site. In left sidebar right now we have search and tools box, so we want one more underneath that with a quote

1. Click Structure - Click Block Layout - Click Custom Block Library - Click Add Custom Block 

Block Description: Food Quote of the Day
Body: All you need is love. But a little Chocolate now and then dosent hurt
  -- Charles M.Schulz
Click Save

It will come to  main block layout page, now we see click Place block in which region we want to place it. Now we want to display in sidebar first,
Click Place block in Sidebar first - Select custom block we create - Click Save block 

Now we can see custom block will display in left sidebar

2. The previous block created we used own markup, we write the code into text field provided and then we use semantic markup to add blockquote 
    Now we are going to bring content from 3rd party tool and display on the sidebar as a block 

1. Click Structure - Click Block Layout - Click Custom Block Library - Click Add Custom Block 

Block Description: Spicy Food

Goto https://embed.ly/code - Click Instagram - Copy embed code

Body: Click Source - Full HTML - paste the embed code - Click Save 

 Now we want to display in sidebar first,
Click Place block in Sidebar first - Select custom block we create - Click Save block 

Now we can see custom block will display in left sidebar

So this is easy way to integrate 3rd party tool using embed code 

3. Now we discuss about settings options available to the blocks, many options are available whether it is custom block or system block 
   Previously we created custom block which uses embed code from instagram and it is specifically related to tc4a user (ie) admin user on this site, so we want to display this block only on individual profile page and not everywhere on the site

1. Click pencil icon on block - Configure block
- Uncheck Display title 

Now we want this particular block to display only on one page in site is with Pages tab
   We want this particular block to only display in user profile page or individual users this instagram account depends on, in order to make this happen we need to find out the url of particular user 

Click tc4a in new tab - View profile - We can see url tied to that /user/1

Now come to configure tab
Pages: /user/1* - so anything of user with /user/1 and anything else that come out after, this block should display on any of those pages, however it should not display on anyother pages

Click Save block 

Now it wont display the instagram block in main page, but it will display on localhost:8012/tc4a/user/1


Menus
    Contents is most important element of ur site, the menu system enables ur user to access that content, so menus are ur site navigation 
     The main navigation menu is currently displaying as the primary menu like About, Home, Why Tasty Cakes?. This is primary menu or top level navigation of the site, it leads to landing pages for different section of the site.
    Administration menu is the menu at top of browser when u logged in, so the black Manage bar with grey content, structure, appearance etc. We also see user account menu in default layout which says My Account and logout. All of these menus can be customized and we can create new ones 

1. Click Structure - Click Menus
        We can see list of all of menus that exist on our site and we can make changes to those particular menus. We can see tables which list the titles for all of menus that comes with Drupal installation as well as description of each menu and operations that allow us to edit the menu or add link to these menus 

2. Click Edit menu on Main Navigation 
      We can change the title which we saw as Main Navigation when we look at the menu list and we change the summary which is description that we see about the menu. It is good idea to put title and summary about menus because when we coma back to the site a year after u developed, we may not remember exactly why u made the menus. If we have multilingual enabled we can also choose what language the menu is going to display, for example if we do have chinese language audience we can menu that specifically for chinese speaking viewers and dosent display for English viewers. So we 3 menus on top level and 2 menus under Why Tasty Cakes?. Each of these menu link also has operations associated with it including edit and delete link

3. Click Add Link
      The link can be either external or internal, external means that the link is going outside the site whereas internal means it is going to the page within the site. If it is internal link we will type the title of page that we want to goto and for external we have to provide the URL 

Menu Link Title: Celiac Disease Foundation 
Link: http://celiac.org/
Enabled: determines whether ur link is visible in ur menu 
Click Save

Now we can see Celiac Disease Foundation link will be part of top level navigation. Unpublished pages will never show in menu until they are  published, this how prevents users from accidently landing on content which they shouldnt see. The other thing that really great about Drupal and Drupal menu system is that links to contents to which users does not have permission to access will not displayed. So if we have content or view that should only be accessed by admin users it will not display in menu if the user is not authenticated as admin users 

4. Now we rearrange the menu using drag handlebar like Home, About, Why Tasty Cakes, Celiac Diseases Foundation 
   Click Save 

Now menu order makes more sense based on the navigation we created.

5. Adding new menu to site 
        Create our own menus and add them in various region on ur site 

Click Structure - Click Menu - Click Add Menu

Title: External Resources
     Machine names will only have alphanumeric characters, no spaces, can have underscores and hypens, this is the unique name that database uses to understand this particular element, we can machine name if needed but it can be helpful to keep machine name that drupal creates because that machine name is unique 

Administrative Summary: A list of links to other blogs about food sensitivities

Menu Language: English
     When u create this menu, if u have multilingual setup on ur site which we do, we can choose what language this menu displays, when we say not specified it will display in any language 

Click Save

-Now we add links to the menus we created - Add Link 

Menu link Title: Elana's Pantry
Link: http://elanaspantry.com
Parent Link: <External Resources>
Click Save

Menu link Title: Gluten Free Girl
Link: http://glutenfreegirl.com
Parent Link: <External Resources>
Click Save

Menu link Title: Gluten Free Goddess
Link: http://glutenfreegoddess.blogspot.com
Parent Link: <External Resources>
Click Save

Menu link Title: Gluten Free on a Shoestring
Link: http://glutenfreeonashoestring.com
Parent Link: <External Resources>
Click Save

Menu link Title: Rain's Musings on Gluten Free Cooking
Link: http://rainbreaw.com/cooking
Parent Link: <External Resources>
Click Save

We can see the list of menu links. When we go back to Menus page we can see External Resources menu is one of the options in menu list. If we go operations on that menu we can add a link and even we can delete menu since it is not system menu

-Now we will place that menu in our site on sidebar second so that it can be seen by enduser 
     
Click Structure - Click Block Layout - Click Place Block in Sidebar second - Select Place Block of External Resources - Click Save Block - Click Save

Now we can see External Resources menu appears on the right hand side(ie) sidebar second

6. In addition to adding custom menu that we have created to a region on ur site, we may also want to make ur secondary level links for ur primary navigation available (ie) in case of Why Tasty Cakes? link we have child links
    The common practice to use Hover menus where u mouse over a links and the menu popups underneath that. Hover menus are issues when it comes to usability on site, because users with any kind of mobility makes hover menu difficult to navigate. Hover menu also adds excess link list to the menu that will be read by screen reader if u havent implemented proper skip navigation for ur visually impaired users. 
    By default the menus that are available in ur Drupal install are not hover menu because of those usability and accessibility issues within hover menu itself. We do need secondary level links in primary menu to be visible on site otherwise there is no way to access that content

Click Structure - Click Menus - Click Edit menu for Main Navigation 
    We can see 2 links under Why Tasty Cakes?,  and we want to display those 2 links under Why Tasty Cakes?

Click Structure - Click Block Layout - Click Configure on Main Navigation menu 
     Now we add a new instance of that block, so its not going to impact the existing one thats currently displaying in the primary menu region, rather this is going to be a new block that gives same information

Title: Why Tasty Cakes?
Menu Levels:
   Initial Menu Level: 2 - since we want this particular instance to ignore the top level links and only display second level links that appear underneath whatever page we are on

Region: sidebar first 
Click Save 

Now we can see Why Tasty Cakes? menu is at last in sidebar first, but we want to appear in the top because we want secondary level links for that section to be first thing that appear in left side bar, 

so we drag at top - Click Save 

Now we can see on leftside Why Tasty Cakes? block appears with 2 items that are secondary to the particular menu item. When we go to About link we cant see those secondary menu items, because about page does not have sublinks 

So we have discussed to use blocks to display menus where they need to be presented on the site which enables the user to actually be able to access the content which we have created and have reference to site structure that makes the ability to navigate to the site easily


Drupal Modules
   The code that runs on drupal site comes in 2 types of code (ie) core and contributed
   Core code is the code that comes with drupal install and it is part of drupal download from drupal.org. Contributed code is the code that someone from Drupal community or organization who is part of drupal community has created and given back to drupal.org
    Contributed code is not maintain by any of drupal entity but rather by the individual who choose to provide that code and given it back to  community. The code that is written is basically packaged together and then put on to drupal.org or drupal code download as a module which gives a ability to build a specific piece of architecture 
    Code used by modules are usually written in PHP and CSS and adds functionality to ur site 

1. Click Extend 
      Display all of the modules that are available to our site as well as option to install new modules
      Some of the modules are checked and some of them are dont. In each module row there is small description provided, and left of the description, we can see an arrow when we click it, it will provide the information about this module and it is provided by the person who wrote the module. 
     Module also has security updates, in this module description we have version which represents the version of module that running and just like drupal core it is important that we keep track of any security updates that are released for a module, because if u have been running a module that requires critical security update and you want that update when u leaving ur site just as exposed as you didnt update drupal core when major security update comes out 

Enabling Module 
    In our site, under the tools box on left side we have only option available is Add Content, we have some content from the front page, we have some sub menus 
    If we want to add contents, we go to tools and click Add Content we have Articles and Basic page, only 2 content types available right now.

Click People - Click Permissions tab
      We can scrolldown to F section and see that what we control permission for FieldUI, File, Filter and those are the only options under F category because we didnt enable other modules 

Click Extend - Search: Forum - Enable checkbox - Click Install

Click Content - Click Add Content - We can see new content type "Forum Topic" is added 

Subject: Egg Substitutes
Forums: General discussion
Body: some dummy text
Click Save 

Now we can see forum with breadcrumbs as Home, Forums, General Discussion and also this particular content type have immediately has comments enabled and link for "General Discussion". Clicking on that, it will take to general discussion and any topics that is created in this forum are now available in the list 
    In the tools box on the left, we can see 2 links Add Content and Forums. When we click on Forums, it will take me to all of the forums available on this particular site 
   
Click People - Click Permissions tab - Scroll down to F sections
    We can see permission available for Forum category 

Now we go back to our site - Click Forums on left side - Click General discussion - Click Egg Subsitutes
    For sake of presentation we add some comments
Subject: Flaxseeds
Comment: 1 tbsp flaxseeds with 2 2tbsp water make a hearty substitute that helps with binding
Click Save 

Go back to Forums and it will keeping track of the comments as posts in the topic as well, so in that table we can see 2 posts in 1 topic. So all this functionalities are happen just we have enabled forum modules

Click Structure - Click Forums - Click Settings 
    Here also we can adjust the settings of forums module and changes the way this module behaves 

How do we select the module?
    We are currently under Extend section of the Manage tab on the site, it shows list of all modules available to our site which means all bits of functionalities that we can add to the site as little packages. All of the modules that is available in the list came with drupal core installation 
    Consider we need some functionalities which does not comes with drupal installation, we go to drupal.org and look for contributed modules 

Goto drupal.org - Build - Modules 
      We can see different modules that been contributed by community, so it is upto we decide which modules is best suited for ur needs 

Now we are going to select a module called Display Suite
Maintenance Status: actively maintained
Works with: Drupal 9
Search Modules: display
  Click Search button

Now we see how to install contrib modules into site in 3 ways
Click Extend - Click Install new module   

1. Now we can give url of module and install 

2. Download the module and choose the related downloaded file

3. Using drush stands for Drupal Shell, this is the command line method for managing ur drupal site


Now we goto drupal.org and download the display suite tar.gz module file 
1. Extract the file
2. copy the folder and paste insise xampp/htdocs/tc4a/modules folder
3. Goto Extend menu in site, under search if we type display, it will list all of the modules that are inside display suite package 
4. Now click and install all related modules 

How we make changes to existing content types?
     The ability to create unique conten types and serve the needs of various kinds of things that ur site might need to display. Each of the content type can behave very differently, each content type is made up of fields such as in the article content type where we have title, body, tags and image fields, these are the fields that created on the form for the content type 
    You can customize what fields are available and add new ones if we like to, we can also set different rules for how each of those fields will display and in what order it should display. Your form that the editor fills out can have different field ordered when they display when the enduser sees. As the site builder we are not limited to drupal core content types, we also not limited to once that might be created by modules that u enable   
     Specifically we look at modifiying the fields on content type as well as modifying some of the default behaviour of the content type itself. So we will look at article content type 

Click Home - Click Exploring Spices - Click Edit 
     Looking at the form we have lot of information like title, body, tags and image field but perhaps we might be using lot of images that are showed publicly using creative comments, if we are going to that then we need to credit the photographers so in order to do this we are going to add a field for photo credit 

Menu Settings - Provide a menu link
     We can easily add this kind of content to a menu, it dosent really make sense in the context of this particular site for article, which is sort of blogpost to be in a menu. We dont want people to post article accidently or intentionally add them to main menu because that will really impact the user interface that we trying to create in a negative way, so as a site builder we protect the integrity of site by removing the possiblity of people do things that they shouldnt
    So the task regarding this particular article content type is that we need to add photo credit field to node form and we need to remove the ability to easily add article to menu from the node form itself

1. Manage the content type which were going to do under 
Manage tab - Click Structure - Click Content types 
     Each content type that is listed along with description it also has Operation column. This drop down menu has 5 options 
   - Manage fields which allows to add or edit the field that u have on ur form 
   - Manage form display which allows to change the order of those fields in the way those fields look for the person entering the content 
   - Manage display which allows you to change how those fields are going to display or how the content type will display to the enduser
   - Edit which is where u will edit menu settings, the place where we can change the general settings for this particular content types such as description etc
   - Delete 

2. Now we want to remove the content type ability to be place in menu from the node form
Click Article - Click Edit in Operations - 
     There are number of things we can change in this particular section, including the description for the content type which can be really helpful for the site managers and content editors. We can also change title field label, for example if this content type is person content type where we entire person info, then field name can be name instead of title
     Publishing options - this is where we have default publishing option and in case of article, by default articles are promoted to front page, if we dont want that we can uncheck 'promoted to front page'
     Display settings - allows to determine whether or not submitted by information displays on the content for the enduser
     Menu settings - This particular content type is placed in the main navigation menu, but we dont want to place in any menu so we uncheck Main Navigation and leave all of them unchecked

Click Save 

So whenever we click Add Content Type - Click Article 
   Now menu settings have been disappeared from the list of options on right hand side, so we cant add any article to the menu from node form, we have to manage menu itself in order to add article 

3. Next we need to add photo credit field to this content type
Click Structure - Click Content types - Click Manage Field under Operations for the Article 
    We have the fields which is already available body, comments, image and tags 

Click Add field 
Add a new field:  Text(plain)
Label: Photo credit
    Whem we enter Photo credit on right side we can see machine name as field_photo_credit, the machine name is important this is how the database recognizes what is this particular field is, we cannot have 2 fields with same machine name, all machine names should be unique. 
Click Save
Click Save and Continue
Click Save Settings

Now we can see Photo credit field 

- Now we edit existing article and add photo credit
Click Content - Click Exploring Spices - Click Edit 
Photo Credit: Senthil
Click Save 

Now if we scrolldown we can see photocredit at the bottom. So we took default content type article and modify its behaviour 

4. Next to adjust how the content type displays to the end user. We look various display options available when managing the content type
1. Form display
Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Manage form display under Operation for Article 
  - We drag Photo Credit below Images
  - Now click Settings of Photo Credit
    Size of textfield: 100
    Placeholder: Name of Photographer
    Click Update
  - Click Save

- Click Content - Click Add Content 
       Now we can see placeholder for Photo credit field

5. Now we goto Exploring Spices article and photo credit will be displayed in the bottom of the article. Now we change the way, the fields displays to the enduser 

Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Manage Display under Operation for Article
   Drag photo credit under image - Change Label as Inline - Click Save

Go to Exploring Spcies, now photo credit will be displayed after the image 

6. If we goto Home page, Exploring Spcies article has a teaser display and this dosent show photo credit. Now we want to display photo credit on to the teaser
     In the Manage display section there are 3 options like Default, RSS, Teaser. RSS is what feeds, what feeds are available in those fields and what order all those fields are available. Teaser are whats been used as overall news on the home page 

Click Teaser - Drag Photo credit under Body - Change label as Inline - Click Save

When we goto home page we can see photo credit is displayed in the teaser  


Creating Custom Content Type
      The site builder is intended to display receipes and events along with pages. Receipes and events should be the own content type in drupal site because they need to portait that in a very different way from blogpost and basic pages
     Receipes should have information such as meal type and ingredients. Events should include information such as how to join the events, date and time of the event and phone number, this means we are going to have different fields so that the form is different 

1. Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Add Content Type
    Name: Event
    Description: Use this to add webinar events
    Publishing Option: only published
         We are just pusblishing this content type but we are not promoted to front page 
    Display Setting: uncheck display author& date
         This setting determines whether or not "submitted by" info will appear in the teaser and on node itself. In this case we dont want to display author and date info so uncheck it
    Menu Setting: Uncheck Main Navigation
        This determines whether or not it is easy to add the particular piece of content to the menu directly from node form. In the case of events we dont want that so we uncheck it

Click Save and manage fields 

Now we can able to manage the fields of content type. Now only field that exists apart from necessary title field is body field. The first field we are going to add here is going to be the existing field (ie) the image field that used in article content type. On the article content we can see image field, whereas on page content there is no image 
    On event content type we like to have image which behave exactly same way it does on the article content type, for that reason we use existing field rather than creating new field.If u want any of the behaviour to be different in this particular content type then we need to create new field not using the existing ones 

Click Add field 
Reuse an existing field: Image:field_image
Click Save and Continue

We can add Help text if we want. Next we can set whether or not this field is required, in this this field should not be required. We can give default image so for every event we can have some kind of image that goes with, if the user dosent upload new images for the event. We can also change "Allowed File extensions", consider we want to allow pdf here, in this case actually dont since we want it to behave like image
 
File Directory: images/events
     File Directory field will determine where any uploads are stored in ur directory, in this case we want to store in images directory with subdirectory events inside it  

Click Save Settings

Now we can see 2 fields on Event content type (ie) body and image. Next feild we want to add is the field that will help the user knows how to join the event. For the purpose of this demo,lets say every event that Tasty Cakes connect would be a webinar, so this field should be link that would allows the user to join the webinar

Click Add Field
Add a new field: Link
Label: Webinar Link - Click Save and Continue

Each of them will have only 1 webinar link so
Allowed values: Limited - 1
Click field settings

Help Text: Include the link to the webinar so that users can join the event
Check Required field
Allow Link text: Disabled 
   - Determines whether URL or text to display, we check disabled so URL will be displayed 
Click Save

We now have 3 fields in our event content type

2. Now we add event content to Event node

Click Content - ClicK Add Content - Click Event

Title: Homemade Baby Food
Body: some dummy text 
Image: babyfood.jpg
Alternative text: Healthy baby food
Webinar link: https://www.nestle.com
Click Save

Now we can see the event is placed with basic settings 

3. Now we add field which specifically design to hold telephone number in the event content type. We can simply use plain text field for phone numbers but there are few reasons why we want this to be special field
   - First there are so many people are accessing websites on mobile devices, it only make sense for phonenumbers on site to be clicked and make it easy for mobile users to make call right there
   - Second semantic markup which is the markup that tells the browser valuable info about the content being displayed is helpful for those viewing site through screen readers such as non sighted users, it also ensures that the content that can be easily translated to future technologies or migrate from one place to another
     - Finally as with urls and email address, phone numbers can be improperly entered, using a field to design specifically for phonenumber will help to check the data entered is accurate 
    To enter phone number there is no specific fields are available. So we need to intall  module called Telephone

Click Extend - Search for Telephone - Click Install

Click Structure - Click Content Type - Click Manage field under Operation for Events

Click Add field 
Add a new field: Telephone number
Label: Phone  - Click Save and Continue
Allowed number of values - Limited - 1
Click Save field Settings

Help Text: Please include a contact phone number if available

We need to have a default phone number to use in the event when no phonenumber is provided
Phone: (123) 456-7890
Click Save Settings 

Now we want to add that phonenumber to Homemade Baby Food event
Click Content - Click Edit on Homemade Baby Food

We can see phonenumber field in bottom, the reason why particular node which we already created dose not contain default phone number is because this node is already exists before we made the change to the event. If we create new event then we can see the default phone number is in the form field. So it is important to know the changes to the content type after content has already created not necessarly reflect on the existing content 

Phone: (123) 464-0873
Click Save 

Now we can see phonenumber in the bottom of event type

4. Now in order to make phonenumber linked and users can directly call to that number. In order to make it link we go for display settings in content type

Click Content - Click Edit on Homemade Baby Food - Click Manage Display tab
     We change format of Phone field as Telephone link instead of Plain text 
Click Save

Now we can see the phonenumber become clicked, and when we click on it, it will prompt for making call by lanuching an appl with which we can make external call. 

5. Now we add another important field called date and time. Events typically takes place at specific point in time, we also want events to display in list of upcoming events and we want those list to automatically update when an event passes without having to edit the site

Click Structure - Click Content Type - Click Manage field under Operation for Events

Click Add field 
Add a new field: Date
Label: Event date 
Click Save and Continue

In this case we want date and time for date type or even we could choose date only if ur events are not time specific
Date type: Date and time
Allowed number of times: Limited 1 
Click field settings 

Help text: Date and time of the event
Check required field - because we want to make sure that our events are always set in time
  
We can also add some default value which can be current date or relative date such as 3 days from now 
Default date: None
Click Save settings 

Now we want to add that date field to Homemade Baby Food event
Click Content - Click Edit on Homemade Baby Food

When we scrolldown we can see event date which tells us the format and gives us easy fields to setup date and time 
   Even we can change the format of date field instead of calendar
Click Structure - Content type - Select Manage Form Display under Event - For Event Date instead of using Date and time we can choose select list also 

Event date: 10/14/2022 5:00:00 PM
Click Save

Scrolling down at bottom we can see event date and time displayed 

6. Now we look at changing date and time display, because for example we are confident that users are comfortable with 24hrs clock, the date and time created here displays based on 24hrs clock. The another reason to change, the designer of the site asks for date and time to look very specific so we want to make that happen in our date time format 
   So now we want to change 24hr clock to 12hr clock 

Click Structure - Click Content Type - Click Manage display under Operation for Events

Click Settings option for Event Date field
    We can able to choose from list of date format which is created during drupal install itself, except Time Only which we created by configuring drupal site. All of the times that listed here happens to be from 24hrs clock 
    Since we need 12hr clock we need to create new date format in order to available to us in this list
   So we set new date format in configuration

Click Configuration - Click Date and time format - Click Add format 

Name: Date and time with 12hr clock
Format String: F j, Y - g:H a
Click Add Format 

Click Structure - Click Content Type - Click Manage display under Operation for Events

Click Settings option for Event Date field - Choose Date and time from 12hr Clock
Click Update
Click Save

When we goto event page and scroll down, we can see the date is updated to 12hr clock

7. Now we look at the display settings and make sure the way that content type displays is logical 
   Now we look at the Homemade Baby food event, when we scrolldown we have bunch of text about the event. We have image field which has label on it called "Image" which is unnecessary for this event. It also contains webinar link, phone number and event date, but this information has to be displayed on top of the event but not at the bottom 

Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Manage display under Operation for Event 

Drag Image under Links - Change Label as Hidden 

Drag Eventdate above Image - Change Label to Inline, so that we can see label and date in same line

Drag Links down to bottom, because it is relavent only for administrator 

Now make Webinar link and Phone label as inline

Click Save

Now we can see event date right at the top, next we have image with no label, then we have event description and at bottom we have webinar link and phone number

8. Now we look at the way the teaser displays the event because we use teasers a lot for list of events. So very quick way to see this is to promote this event on front page, because front page will show teasers for all of the content 

Click Content - Click Homemade Baby Food - Click Edit - Under Promotion Options - Select Promoted on to front page - Click Save

Now if we goto home page and scroll down, we can see the event listed, but it is not helpful listing for this event because it dosent tell us when the event is happening, it dosent give any info about webinar link or any other info, it also dosent display the image which is really nice to see in the teaser because we do have image on this content 

Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Manage display under Operation for Event - Click Teaser tab
    Now we can see it displays links and body, the body format is summary or trimmed because in teaser we dont want entire info we just want the summary, so other info we want is 

Drag Image before body with label as Hidden
    We also want image to display much smaller in the teaser, we dont want big original image 
  - Click Setting on Image 
    Image Style: Thumbnail
    Link Image To: Content 
        This is teaser so this is listing someone else and not full node view itself, users are often tempted to click on pictures when they are associated with something that gives more information
Click Update - Click Save 
 
Drag Event date after body with label as Inline 

Now we want to use 12hr clock, so click Setting and select date and time with 12hr clock, and update it 

Now we can see little thumbnail image and seeing event date which is really helpful. Notice the image is not the same size as images on other nodes since other node display are showing medium display

- Click Setting on Image 
    Image Style: Medium
Click Update - Click Save

Now we can see the same size images as other contents and mouse over the image, its clickable and if we click on it, it will take to the node for that event 

9. It is also valuable for ur upcoming event views to have RSS format available to that because RSS feeds will allow indication of the content. For example having ur event content to automatically post on facebook without we going to facebook and tell about the event  

Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Manage display under Operation for Event - Click Default tab
   Under Custom Display Settings - check RSS - Click Save

Now we have new tab for RSS - Click RSS tab
   It take everything from default display, so we disable the image because we dont need in RSS feed

Drag image and place inside Disabled - Click Save
   Now we have RSS display

So event content type display in logical way, the event date is at top and at the bottom we have webinar link and phone number and on home page we are seeing the teaser for the event 

     Now we have examined content type, drupal installation comes with 2 basic content called article and basic page. Previously we have enabled forum module may add content type as well, in this case forum module added forum topic content type. We can customize any content type including default ones and those added by modules. We can also create our own content type, we looked at fields such as telephone, date time

10. Now we add 3 more content to work on the site 

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Event 

Title: Working with Egg Subsitutes
Body: some dummy text
Webinar links: http://keckmedicine.org
Phone: (234) 678-0192
Event date: 01-01-2023
Click Save

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Event 
Title: Gluten free flour blends 
Body: some dummy text
Webinar links: https://www.glutenfreeliving.com/
Phone: (456) 123-0978
Event date: 05-11-2022
Click Save

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Event 
Title: Dining out with the Celiac
Body: some dummy text
Webinar links: https://nationalceliac.org/
Phone: (123) 456-7890
Event date: 20-11-2022
Click Save


Drupal Views
     Views are everything, they are simply a piece of content. Sometimes views are quite complex with all kinds of contexts determining what displays and how it looks and sometimes it would be very simple. There are already some views in our site
  1. On the home page we have river of news, we can see all of the items that promoted to the front page are displaying in teaser form on the home page. This is home page view
  2. In addition to display in teaser form, this content is also displaying ordered in the sticky item first and then date posted descending so that most recent content shows on top
  3. Another view on ur site right from the beginning is the content view
  Under Content we have list of all contents on ur site, this is displaying as table with specific field from each piece of content. For example we see title, content type, author, status whether it is published or not and when it was last updated. These are all fields for specific information from that specific piece of content. The default sort order is updated date descending so that most recently edited content will display in the top
   4. Similarly we have another view for users
Click People 
   Right now we have only user on the site (ie) tc4a account which we are using. Once we have multiple users on the site then all will be listed in this particular view. This view is similar to view of content because it setup exactly in the same way 
   People view and content view have filters in the top, these filters allow u to set parameters as what content will display in the list. They are referred to as exposed filters 

1. We created number of events so we need to create view for upcoming events. This view have 3 displays 
   - A block which shows 3 or 4 upcoming events on home page where everyone will see them right away
   - A page where the user can go to see all of the upcoming events
   - Also a RSS feed, so 3rd sites can know the upcoming events 

2. Creating custom view which is simple page display showing upcoming events using teaser display mode 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Add View

View name: Upcoming Events 
    Just like when we create content types and fields, views also has machine name that automatically created 

Check Description: A list of upcoming events containing a block, page and RSS display 

Show: content of type: Event sorted by: Newest first

Page Setting: we want a page to create
Check create a page
Path: events

We need to add menu link because we need this particular page to display in the menu 
Menu: Main Navigation
Link Text: Events 
Click Save and Edit 

This take to an interface where we can refine my view even further. But now we just go back to the site and click Events tab and we can see all of the events which we created, there is no pager yet because there is no 10 events so there is no need for pager
   Right now events are displayed in teaser form with most recent post. Also we cant edit this page like other pages
   Click Why Tasty Cakes? menu which is page view and right down the title we can see edit and delete tab available where we can edit and delete the page. We also have quick edit option by clicking pencil icon. But in the case Events tab we cant see those tab under title, we do have quick edit option by clicking pencil icon but it dosent allow to edit the content instead we can edit the view
     View is not a node, view is list of nodes so if we want to edit the content in the view we have to edit the content itself not the view
     Views UI is actually separate module from the Views itself  

Click Extend - Search for View module 
    We get 2 core modules called Views and Views UI. Views module actually enables you to have views running on the site, Views UI module that gives the user interface that makes it possible for you to configure the views without actually using the code. When ur site goes into production (ie) when it is live and visible to user, its often good idea to disable views UI module for 2 reasons
    1. Disabling views ui module will help ur site performance
    2. It will prevent users with view permission from accidently editing views on production. If we try to edit a view but do not find views listed under Structure tab, then chances are views UI module is disabled on the site and we need to reenable it in order to edit the views 

Now we see view user interface and what avialable to us when we are working with the views 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under Upcoming Events 
    The first thing right on the top we have displays, right now we have only one display for this view which is page display. We can add additional displays by clicking Add button including another page display or other display that is listed 

Display name: Page
    Any page display will default to display name as page. If we have multiple displays, then we change it
   For example, in this particular situation we are going to have page for upcoming event and also page for past events, so we name this page as upcoming page

Click Page
    Administrative name: Upcoming Page 
Click Apply

This way we know by looking at displays that this particular page is for upcoming events  

Title: Upcoming Events 
    This is the title that user will see on the page 

Format: Unformatted list 
    We can adjust the format of the display, this covers the HTML that renders the view on the page. It was set as unformatted list, by clicking we can change other formats like grid, table. There are lot of modules which give u additional styles for displaying ur contents in views. For example we have slideshow styles we can use, that will used  in views and allow you to display content in slideshow 

Show: Content | Teaser
     We can change this to show specific fields, but now we use contents

Fields: It is currently disabled because we are using content display

Filter Criteria:
    Used to determine which content to display, for example when we create the view we set it to show only content of event content type and that will be the filter that we rely on
Sort Criteria:
   Used to determine in what order content is displaying and right now it display in newest content to be showing first 

Page Settings
   It is here because we are using page display type. With the page we need to know the path of that particular page and need to know whether or not that particular page go into menu. 

Header and Footer
   The header and footer allows you to put the content at the top and bottom of the view 
   
No Results Behaviour 
    This is what happen when nothing returns for a specific query that we are using. For example if there is no upcoming events, the view would display whatever is there in no results behaviour
Click Add - Select Global Text area - Click Add and Configure 
Content: There are no upcoming events
Click Apply

Pager: Mini | 10 items
     This option is used to set how many result to display in the view and to determine if the user gets page through more results 

Preview
   It is the area where we can see ur work before saving the view. If we dont have very fast env however this can really slowdown ur working experience, in that case we may turn off auto preview so things happens more quickly while setting ur configuration 

Click Save  

3. Now we are going to set the filter criteria on the view to make sure the content listed is the only content that actually we want to see. We have Upcoming Event view which shows all of the events that listed on our site 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under Upcoming Events 

Filter Criteria:
     We have 2 criteria already set like publishing status which set to yes which shows only the content that published will display on the site. If we set to no then it will display the content which is not published 
    Next criteria is event (ie) only content type that is pulled into this view is event content.
    Now we want to display only the content which has an image

Click Add 
Select Content: Image(field_image:alt)
Click Add and Configure
Operator: Is not empty(NOT NUll)
Click Apply

Click Save

Now we go to Events tab, we can see only one event that displaying is the event with an image 

Click And/or Rearrange under Filter - Remove Content Image filter - Click Save

Now we can see all the events in Events tab

4. Now we want to have a date filter, we only want to see upcoming events, we dont want to see any content for event date is passed 

Click Add 
Select Content: Event date
Click Add and Configure
Operator: Is greater than or equal to 
value: 2022-10-15 07:00:00
Click Apply

Click Save

Now we go to Events tab, we can see only the event whose date is >= 2022-10-11

Click And/or Rearrange under Filter - Remove Content Image filter - Click Save

Now we can see all the events in Events tab

5. Now we see how to use views user interface to change the sort order for the contents. Now we can see all the events are displaying in descending order (ie) the newest posts first 
    We know Homemade Baby Food is the only event that has an image, so it is important event than others, so we want this to be sticky at the top of the list 

Click Edit from pencil icon on Homemade Baby Food - Click Promotion Options
- Uncheck Promoted to first page
- Check Sticky at top of lists
- Click Save

If we see the view page, the sticky at top of the list dosent make any change, thats because it is control by sort criteria of view, right now only sort criteria that exists on the view is to show the most recently posted item 

Now we go to Sort Criteria - Click Add 
    Right now we have only one sort criteria based on authored on, now we add 2 more criteria (ie) event date and sticky status 
    Select event date
    Select Sticky at top of lists 
Click Add and Configure
Order: Sort Ascending 
Granularity: Month
Click Save
Order: Sort descending for sticky

The next thing we want to do is to provide the order of sort criteria, these are the rules that determine how the content is going to be listed and what happens is the rule at the top is going to be the first one which applied. But we want sticky content to be the first that appears on the page, so we want to make sure sticky rule is the first one applied to the view. Next thing we want to apply to the view is event date rule which says show the next upcoming content first. In this particular case we dont want authored on sort criteria in place, because thats not relavent to the upcoming events display 

Click Rearrange under Sort Criteria 
Remove authored on because we dont want that
Next drag Sticky to the top of list as first followed by event date

Click Apply
Click Save 

Now we go to events tab, we can see sticky item is jump upto the top of list and looks like sticky with grey background. If we scroll down we can see the events are listed in chronological order based on event date 

6. Now we create block view display to upcoming event which simply list title and date of upcoming events 
    We goto Home page and we see the recent article that has been promoted to the front page but we dont have any information about the events that might be happening

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under Upcoming Events

Now we add a new display to this view
Click Add - Choose Block because we need block element that we can place in sidebar of home page
    Now we can see Block as one of element in Display list. We keep title, format everything unchanged
    Under Show, we dont want to show content in teaser, we want to see title, event date for specific event in home page 

Click on Content
For: This block(override)
Row: Fields
Click Apply(this display)
Click Apply

Fields:
   By default it has title in it, we also want to add event date because we want to display in that particular block 

Click Add under Fields
For: This block(override) - because we want this change only in this block
Select Content: Event date
Click Apply(this display)
Click Apply(this display)

Now we can see title and event date under Preview option

Sort Criteria:
   Now we dont want sticky at top of list to be relavant in this particular display. This display is simply 3 next event that are happening and sticky at top of list will unnaturally promote an event above the 3, so we dont want that to happen 

Click Rearrange Under Sort Criteria
For: This block(override)
Remove Sticky at top of list
Click Apply(this display)

Pager:
   Right now by default this view is using pager and it is limiting to 10 items. We dont want pager at all and actually limited to 3 items 

Click Mini Under Pager
For: This block(override)
Pager: Display specified number of items
Click Apply(this display)
Items to display: 3
Click Apply

More Link:
   The next we want change is more link which is set as No, this will give a link at bottom of view to more information. We actually want this because this little block is basically a teaser block encouraging the user to click and see the overview of all the upcoming events 

Click No under More Link
For: This block(override)
Check Create More Link
Click Apply(this display)

Click Save 

Now we can see under preview section all upcoming events listed and at a bottom a link for more information will be created
   The title field is simply linked to the content and event date is displayed using the sites default medium format which uses 24hr clock 

7. Now we are making some changes over the field
       1. First we take title field and provide a header tag around it, specifically h3 tag, so when html renders it has good semantic markup
       2. For date field we create label telling the user what that particular field representing and uses 12hr clock 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under Upcoming Events

Click Content: Title under Fields 
    First thing we want to pay attention is that we are using override so all the changes we made are going to impact only the block display. We dont want the label on title field, so we wont check "Create a label" option.
    We also have an option to exclude this feild from display, so it is odd to have a field in ur field lists but exclude from display, this is something that used frequently when constructing more advanced views. We may need the info from a particular field available to be rewritten to other field or we want field info available but not visible 
     Title field is currently "Link to the Content" and we want to leave it as it is. If we are adding an image field then it wont link to the content by default, we have to do so

Style Settings:
     This has to do with how the field is rendered in HTML in the view
Check Customize field HTML - because we want this field to render as header, we want good semantic markup on every element on the site 
HTML Element: h3

No Results Behavior:
  Select Hide if empty -  It will tell whenever field is empty that need to exist on content 

Click Apply(this display)

In the preview section, we can see the title is larger and bold because it has h3 tag to it

8. Now we make some edit to event date fields 

Click Content:Event date under Fields 
Date Format: Date and time with 12hr clock 

Click Rewrite Results
  Check Override the output of this field with custom text
Now from the replacement patterns we are going to find event date 

Text: <strong>Date & Time:</strong> {{ field_e }}

No Result Behaviour: Check Hide if empty 

Click Apply(this display)

In preview section, we can see Date and time in formatted view

Click Save 

9. Now we are going to place the block display that we created in upcoming events views on the home page 
  Now we place the block right below external resources in the sidebar 

Click Structure - Click Block Layout 
Click Place Block under Sidebar Second 
Click Place Block of Upcoming Events, this option only exist because we create block display. If we did not create block display it will not be available in list of blocks
    We have list of options, first we can display the title or not and there is checkbox where we can override the title if we want to say something else. We can also change the number of items that display on the block, if the default setting that we configure when we set up the view is not that really want for this particular display
   We can also restrict where the block displays
Click Pages
Pages: <front>
Click Save Block

Click Save Blocks

Now if we go to home page, we can see list of upcoming events on the sidebar below External Resources. When we click More link, it will go to page of upcoming events 

RSS Feed display
     It is good idea to create feed for any content that will be available for syndication( syndication in which content is made available from one website to other sites) by 3rd party. 
     On home page we have a block displaying upcoming events, at the bottom we have more link which take us to upcoming events page and when we scroll down upcoming events page we can see all of the events and last item is the last event 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under Upcoming Events

Click Add - Select Feed
    We can red border around Feed this means some kind of error with this display perhaps even entire view will not work until this error is fixed. When we scroll down we have error message which says "Display Feed uses a path but the path is undefined", because of this the preview area is not working. We will change the display settings by doing so we can rectify this error

Display Name: Feed 
     We can leave display name as feed because we dont have more than one feed here

    But we change the title, feeds are usally intended for 3rd parties not for ur site itself, so it is useful to have branding in the title itself. 
Title: Upcoming Events for Tasty Cakes for All 
    We dont want to this title change to affect all displays, we only want to change only feed display 
For: This Feed(Override)
Click Apply(this display)

Format:
   Unless u r very well comfortable with RSS feeds, leave the settings as it is 

Sort Criteria:
    Also for the feed it is typically not a good idea to include sticky at top of the lists in sort criteria. The sort should be purely the list of content in the order the events will take place or in some cases in the order in which they are posted with the new posting first 

Click Rearrange under Sort Criteria 
For:This feed(override)
Remove sticky at top of list
Click Apply(this display)

Now we need to set path for the field which get rid of error message and also gives url which we can give to 3rd party recipents 

Click No Path is set under Path
    It is always very nice to make sure the path indicates what the content is and also include RSS.xml or feed at the end, so the recipient is very clear on what they receive 
    Path: events/rss.xml
    Click Apply 
This is very helpful url that tells 3rd party what they are going to get.

Notice red border around the feed is now gone and preview section will work at this point

Attach to:
    Now we attach this feed to all 3 displays (ie) master, block, upcoming page 
Displays: Select all 3 options
Click Apply

Pager:
   We do want to display a specified number of items because pager dosent really work in a feed environment. But rather than 10 we need more item like 20 
Click on 10 items 
Items to display: 20
Click Apply

Click Save 

Now we can preview RSS feed, it is meant to display in markup, because this is wht RSS reader are going to see 

When we goto Events tab which display upcoming events page, when we scroll down we can see new RSS feed icon, this allows user to quickly subscribe to that feed if they want to.

Till now we have discussed about views, so we created views with 3 displays like
  1. Page display - Click Events tab
          It shows all of the upcoming events in teaser form 
  2. Created block display for home page - click home tab
    In the right sidebar we see next 3 upcoming events listed in order
  3. RSS display that can be used for content syndication   


Text Formats and how to customize it
      Drupal is CMS and depending on how u setup ur drupal site and what permissions give to ur users, u r making it possible for people to add content in line. The content needs to be formatted which means markup
      Markup added by random users or even trusted users present 2 potential problems
1. Security
      If ur user can add any HTML that they want into ur site, they can potentially leave back to us for cross site scripting or other security host. They can do this intentionally but it is likely they will do so unintentionally and not realizing what they have done
2. Design
      We will all like to believe that everyone realize that red text is not good experience design. But the reality is that there are lot of content editor who dont know about good branding, design consistency and best practices. They simply want their content to be noticed and they do anything to make that happen 
     In order to prevent the integrity of ur design and brand it is important to limit what they can do to the key option of styles 
     Text formats are the method that drupal uses to restrict what users can do while entering and formatting contents

Click Configuration - Click Text formats and Editors

By default drupal comes with 4 formats 
1. Basic HTML - It is fairly safe text format available to authenticated users. It allows the things like bold, italics, anchor tag and images 
2. Restricted HTML - It is much more limited filter design specifically for non authenticated users or anonymous user who may enter content. The types of content that anonymous user may enter could include comments or filling out message field on a form. Content entered using this filter will have potential security host removed from it before it render on the page
3. Full HTML - allows the content editor to use any HTML markup that they want to, they wouldnt able to use PHP, JS. This format will by default available to administrator role only and this format will be used only by trusted user 
4. Plain text - The user not able to make the content bold, italic 

1. Basic HTML
Click Configure under Operations in Basic HTML
     The first thing that we can do here is to choose which roles to use text format. By default drupal has authenticated user, administrator set to be able to use basic html text format 
     Next we can choose is text editor which used for the input format, by default drupal core comes with CKEditor, we can also add ur own 

Enabled Filters
    What ur text format does will apply filters to whatever been entered into body field or whatever field that filter is available for, those filters will change anything that need to be modified 
    For example, we have format which automatically convert urls into links. The important filter is "Limit allowed HTML tags" which strips any potentially nasty code on ur design 

Filter processing order
    We also have list of formats with drag handlebars, we want to order the format in the order that we want to applied to the content

Filter settings
     The important is "Limit allowed HTML tags" and we see in the textfield that all of the html tags that this particular text format will allow without stripping them out before the content is rendered on the page 

Click Save


When entering content the text formats that are available on the text area field will display in the ordered that are listed in this configuration page. The first one that will show for the user is the first one they have permission for use. For example for ur authenticated user the first one they will show is basic html, for anonymous user the first one they will show is restricted html 

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Article 
    We have body field which is text area, in 
Text format area basic html shows first, then restricted html and then full html because thats the order that listed on the configuration page 

Now we are going to review CKEditor which is default editor available for text formats in drupal, we also look how we can customize CKEditor to be little bit more appropriate for ur specific site 

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Article 
     This is node form for article content type, the body field has some basic formatting options available
Body: paste some dummy text
     We format the content like bold, italic etc. It is very easy for me to format my content using buttons at top of the text editor. The buttons that are avialable in ur editor should correspond directly to the markup that would be allowed by the text format that being used 
     The visual editor can be customize for each specific text format. Right now we use basic html text format, but if we select Full HTML we can see lot more options in the list of buttons at the top 

How to format the visual editor to match the markup thats allowed by the specific text format?
   Click Configuration - Click Text formats and Editors
     First we can see different text format have different text editors, more specifically basic html and full html have access to CKEditor, but restricted html and plain text do not have text editor. If we add other libraries to ur site and those libraries will be available to add as the default text editor for ur specific text format.

Click Configure under Operations in Basic HTML, under Text Editor we can choose which text editor we need

Toolbar configuration
    This allows us to determine which buttons are going to show and what order it will display in our active toolbar. So the buttons that available match the tags that u r allowing through ur filter 

Limit allowed HTML tags:
   Inside Allowed HTML tags:
      So depending on the allowed tags, so if we want add any allowed tags on the toolbar. We can drag any related button and put in active toolbar 

CKEditor plugin settings 
    This setting current has only image, if we add any modules we can have more options. The first thing that we specify here is whether or not images can be uploaded through visual editor, in this case we want to allow that because our user want to put images inline in the body of the tags. We can specify a directory that images go into which is good because that helps us to keep our file directory updated. It can also control maximum dimension and also maximum file size allowed 

Click Save

Once we reload the article page we can see new buttons available on toolbar 

Image Fields
     One of the common things for content editors to want to do is that images inline to body of the content 

Click About tab
     Now we are going to add a image in the body 
Click Edit
Click Image button in toolbar 
Image: cakes.jpg
Alternative text: Cakes
Align: Right
Check Caption
Click Save

We can give some caption for the image  

Click Save

Now we can see images on the page, it looks quite nice because drupal with default theme make image styled in very nice way. However the images inline in the content its not something that we can control with the use or put into teaser.

Goto Home page, where we have all teaser that have the image displaying in nice way, because images are field in the article content type and it is able to pulled into the view in a very special format. But adding image inline into the content is basically part of joining block of text 

Goto About page - so this image is no way differentiated as far as drupal is concerned from the text around it, it just part of the same piece of data    
    
How to automatically manipulate how images display on the site?
    If we look at home page we have river of news view of all of the items that promoted to front, we see that images are displayed in clean and consistent manner with proper width for this display. Each image in each of the teaser is using as image tag of medium and it makes them all in consistent look 
    If we click at anyone of the node, the image is displaying quite large which is using original image style as oppose to the medium style that we are seeing on the home page
    The image display in responsive manner, responsive means that the image itself or the browser as a whole will reshape according to the view in device the user has. So if the user is looking at the site through mobile phone it would be quite narrow and small then the image and the interface around it will all be optimized in that environment 

Goto More tools - Developer tools - Click Toogle device  and change the size for any mobile device
    As soon as we did everything has changed and the image drop down in size so that it wouldnt exceed width of the browser screen, this means that this is responsive design and image itself responsive and works nicely regardless of what device we used to visit this site
     There are 4 default image styles that come drupal installation like thumbnail, medium, large and original image 

Click Configuration - Click Image Styles 
    We can see 3 default image styles provided like thumbnail, medium and large. Medium style is used on home page in the river of news display 
    A good example when u want to use a image style will be a grid when we are displaying number of images together. Now we create such type of display in our page

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Add new View 
View Name: Images
Show: Content of Type: Article

Click Create a page
Display format: Unformatted list of: fields
Items to display: 100
Click Save and Edit

Click Add under Fields
Click Content: Image
Click Apply(all display)

Formatter: Image
Image Style: Medium(220*220)
Link Image to: Content 
Click Apply

When we scrolldown we can see list of all of images, we have one article here thats displaying which dosent have an image, so we apply filter 

Click Add under Filter Criteria 
Click Content:Image
Click Apply(all display)
Operator: IS NOT EMPTY
Click Apply

Next thing we want to do is to display as grid not as unformatted list 

Click Unformatted list under Format
Style: Grid 
Click Apply(all display)
Number of columns: 3
Click Apply

Next we want to change the order so image show first and title present underneath

Click Rearrange under Fields
Drag Content Image first
Click Apply

Click Save

Now we goto localhost:8012/tc4a/images page we can see a grid with 3 images lined up in a row with the title underneath that. All of the images

2. All 4 images started with exact same aspect ratio (ie) landscape aspect. But what happens if we add an image that has portrait aspect ratio

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Article 

Title: About fruits
Body: some dummy text 
Images: fruits.jpg (portrait image)
Alternative Text: Fruits benefits
Photo Credit: Fruits
Click Save 

If we scrolldown we can see how the images displays and if we goto  http://localhost:8012/tc4a/images, previously we can see all images are aligned nicely in grid but an image with wrong shape which looks messy 

3. Now we are going to fix the formatting of the images in this table by creating new image style so the grid looks fine

Click Configuration - Click Image Styles - Click Edit under Medium
      The medium image style which says 220*220 is using an effect called Scale and that effect has set to scale the image down to be wider than 220 pixels, so whichever the dimension of image is larger and thats the one will be scaled, but the shape of the image will remain exactly the same 
    We have other effects that we can choose from and these effects also useful for various reason. One of them which adjust the screen now is scale and crop. Scale and crop will resize the image in 1D to fit the size we are looking for and crop the top and bottom half of the image, so the image has proper aspect ratio in order to fit into exact shape we want to be  

Click Configuration - Click Image Styles - Click Add Image Style
   Image Style name: Grid Image
   Click Create New Style 
   Select Scale and Crop under Effect 
   Click Add
   width: 200   Height: 100
   Click Add Effect 
   Click Save

Now this style will be avialable to me in all of areas where images are display

Goto http://localhost:8012/tc4a/images
Click Edit View by clicking pencil icon
Click Content:Image under Fields
Image style: Grid Image
Click Apply(all displays)
Click Save

Now we can see all of the images have fit into the grid nicely and all sized in same way 

In our file system \tc4a\sites\default\files\styles\gr\public\2022-10, we can each of these images that is exactly the size of image changed to 200*100 dimension, so drupal is actually creating a real file for the presentation of image 

Click Configuration - Click Image Style 
   Under Operation of Grid image we can see one of the options as Flush, if we change ur image style then we want to flush the existing ones which will remove all of those image files that was created and start generating new image file based on new style setting that we have placed

4. Previously we created new image style that was 200 pixel wide and 100 pixels high that we called grid image. We have applied grid image style to this view and thats what enabling each image to have same aspect ratio and make this view looks very professional 
    Unfortunately one of the image which happens to be portrait aspect ratio, this cause cropping on this image to be strange because it is focussing on center of image. This image styles by default adjust according to the actual center of the image, we can fix this using contributed module called focal point

1. Download focal point module and paste inside
\htdocs\tc4a\modules
   It also need crop api module 

2. Click Extend - Search for crop and Focal point - Click Install

3. Goto http://localhost:8012/tc4a/images, click on that particular image - Click Edit - Scroll down to image and we can see crosshair symbol exist on image and we drag them to center of the page 
Click Save

But nothing change in original image, if we goto 
localhost:8012/tc4a/images we can see nothing is changed, the reason is also we made a change to image style, right now image style using an action called scale and crop 

Click Configuration - Click Image Styles - Click Edit for Grid Image 
Click on drop down: select Focal point Scale and crop
Click Add
Width: 200 Height: 100
Click Add Effect 

Click Remove under Scale and Crop 
Click Save

Now if we go back to image field, we can see the image is moved to proper place in the image. Sometimes the changes make to the image style will not load right away because there will be cached version of the images stored on ur site. We can get rid of these under the image styles configuration area

Clcik Configuration - Click Image Styles - Click Flush under Grid Image 


File fields
    The file fields are however are slightly different from image fields, as it is designed to handle files that would be downloaded rather than once render on ur page. In order to work with file field we are going to add this field to article type 

1. Click Structure - Click Content Types - Click Manage fields under Article - Click Add field 
  Add a new field: File
  Label: Downloads
  Click Save and Continue

Now we have field settings that we need to go through for the file field
   The first setting we need to choose is whether or not display field need to be enabled. The display field is a checkbox that allows me when we are uploading a file to a node, to choose whether or not that file will display in the list of files on the node. This display would be for the unauthenticated general public
    It is possible that u might be want to upload files to a node without actually display on the node and the content of that field is not intended for the public 

Check "Enable display field" - and now people choose whether or not the file would actually display when user look at the node itself

Check "Files displayed by default" - we want files to be displayed by default 
Click Save Field Settings

Now we get the form to setup file field on article content type

Label: Downloads
Allowed file extensions: pdf - we want allow pdf files 
File directory: downloads  - It is directory in drupal structure where these files will be stored, because these are uploads that user putting into ur directory structure 
Maximum upload size:
   We can limit the upload size if we have limited storage space, it is good idea because if large files are transferred that is going to gives ur site with low performance. So we want to make sure that users are only transferring files that u know ur server can handle
Check Enable description field:
   The description field allows u to enter human readable titles for ur files 
Click Save settings

So we have added file field

2. Now we edit one of article to add this field

Click Content - Click Exploring Spices - Click Edit 

Now we can see file field will be available 

Downloads: select some pdf file
Description: File uploads 

We have checkbox as checked to include file in display or not 

Click Save

Now if we scrolldown, we can see download at the bottom of my node, right now we are file with description with little icon representing what type of file it says

3. If we want to show this files in table format

Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Manage display under article 
Under format choose Table of files for Downloads
Click Save

Now if we go to that content we can see downloads listed in table which include filename and size. As like images this is also an entity that display under content management area

Click Content - Click Files tab
      Here we can see most recent file uploaded which specify file type, size etc


Taxonomy
   Taxonomy is a tool for categorizing content on ur site. Typical tags on blocks are part of taxonomy, the current hashtag trend in social media is part of taxonomy. Both of these examples are typically what would we consider as free tagging, where the user can create any term they want to as they go
     On creating the structure of ur drupal site however we want to create control vocabulary. Control vocabulary can make easy for user to find the content they want, because we are defining structure based on specific subject  
      In order to really demonstrate how control vocabulary in ur taxonomy can help to define the structure of the site make content easy to find 

We goto site https://librarysite.chillco.com/library-events, which is public library site, there are number of pages which has filter at the top like Audience. The Audience filter has list of terms like adults, kids, teens which is called control vocabulary. If we select Teens and click apply, the content that return was the only content that has marked with teens term 

Click Structure - Click Taxonomy
   There are 2 vocabulary already exits. Tags came with drupal installation which is free tagging vocabulary that behaves similarly to hashtags in social media or tagging on blogpost. Forums is the vocabulary that automatically created when we enable the forum module. Forums vocabulary is a controlled vocabulary, any term added to this vocabulary becomes a forum thats available for the people to have discussions 
    So taxonomy is a word for overall functionality for categorizing within ur drupal site. Within taxonomies we have vocabularies, in the librarysite example we have 2 different vocabulary categorizing content like audience and resource type. 
    Individual terms can typically be clicked on to see all of the contents that has categorized with that term. We can see in our site based on free tagging

Goto Home page - Click gluten-free tags under Glutten Sensitivity  
    Now we can see all content that has tagged with gluten free term. This kind of metadata can help to structure the content of ur site as well as create relationship between contents 

There are 2 types of vocabulary
1. Controlled vocabulary have predefined list of terms from which the content editor must choose
2. Free tagging allows the content editor to add whatever terms they want and create new ones when entering content 
    Free tagging is more like hashtag, whereas controlled vocabulary are effective resources for creating a site structure

1. Now we will add controlled vocabulary which is key structure component of our site. Tasty Cakes for all is not only about providing blogpost and events but also receipes. Receipes can be categorized in many ways but in this case users are probably are interested in easily finding receipes based on their food sensitivity, likewise our blogpost may be relavent to specific sensitivity so this is effective way to categorize content on our site 

Click Structure - Click Taxonomy - Click Add Vocabulary
   Name: Food Sensitivities
   Description: Food sensitivities and intolerances are more common than food allergies
   Click Save 

Once vocabulary is created and if we want a controlled vocabulary then it needs to have terms in it

Click Add Term

Name: Gluten free
Description: dummy text 
Click Save

Name: Nut free
Description: dummy text
Click Save

Name: Peanut free
Description: some dummy text
Relations:  Parent term: Nut free
    Peanut free is related to nut free, so parent term for peanut free is nut free,this means that nut free is over peanut free category 
Click Save 

Name: Egg free
Description: dummy text
Click Save

Name: Dairy free
Description: dummy text
Click Save

Now goto taxonomy, click on List fields under Food sensitivities where we can see the structure and peanut free is child of nut free. Each of these term is drupal entity and can be treated just like content files

2. Now this vocabulary is available to the site and we can added to the content type so that they can use it

Click Structure - Click Content type - Click Manage fields under Article  - Click Add field
    The field we are adding is an reference to an entity 
   Add a new field: Taxonomy term 
   Label: Food Sensitivities
   Click Save and continue
Now we need to say which vocabularies is going to be used, obviously we want to use Food Sensitivities category which was by default only because it is first one in alphabetical order
   Type of item to reference: Taxonomy term
   Allowed Number of values: Unlimited
We select unlimited because there may be multiple sensitivity that receipe address 
   Click Save field settings
We can set help text, we can set the feild to required and set default value just like setting anyother field on content type
   Vocabulary: Food Sensitivities
   Click Save settings

Now click Manage form display to control how this particular view looks on node form 
   Food Sensitivities: Check boxes/radio buttons
Because there are too many sensitivities. If we want this to be as free tagging vocabulary we can do so by selecting "Autocomplete term widget(tagging)" which allow to create terms in the field itself, but we dont need since it is controlled vocabulary
    Click Save  

3. Now edit the existing content type

Click Content - Click Edit under The Myth of Healthy
   We can see a new field Food Sensitivities with list of checkboxes 
    Select: Gluten free, Dairy free
    Click Save

Click Manage display - drag Food sensitivities under tags 
Click Save

Now when we look at the content, in the bottom we have see food sensitivities tags on the article, on clicking on one of thing will take us to the list of everything tagged with that particular food sensitivity 
    Right now we have only one item and we have description at the top, because the taxonomy term is an entity and therefore it has fields on it and this text comes from description that we saw when we create taxonomy term itself 

4. We are going to review a creating the content type and we are going to make sure that content type references food sensitivity vocabulary so that we can use to structure how the content is displayed 

Click Structure - Click Content Type - Click Add Content Type
   Name: Recipe 
   
Under Submission form settings, we are going to change title field
   Title field label: Dish name

Under Publishing Options: Disable Promoted to first page 

Under Display settings: Disable Display author and date information 

Under Menu settings: Disable Menu Navigation because we dont want this recipe added to main menu

Click Save and manage fields 

Click Edit Under Body 
    First we change label for Body field to Directions
   Label: Directions 
   Click Save field

6. Now we add some ingredients fields
Click Add field - now we add plain text field for ingredients
   Add a new field: Text(plain)
   Label: Ingredients
   Click Save and Continue
   Allowed number of values: Unlimited - because may be multiple ingredients
   Click Save field Settings 
   Click Save settings

7. Now we add food sensitivity term reference

Click Add field
   This field is already exist because we created it in the article content type 
  Reuse an existing field: Entity reference: field_food_sensitivity
  Click Save and continue
  Vocabulary: Food sensitivities
  Click Save settings

Click Manage form Display, to make sure everything looks proper
   Drag Ingredients before Directions
   Drag Food sensitivities before Ingredients
   Change select list to checkboxex for Food sens
   Click Settings under Ingredients 
   Change Sizeof textfield: 100
   Click Update
   Click Save 

Now we have recipe content type and now we add content for that recipes
Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Recipe

so we can see form to create a recipes

8. In order to create multiple recipes individually, we can use devel module which is helpful when building the site first time and provide sample content in place 

Click Extend - Install Devel4.2.1, Devel Generate module

Now we can see devel setting under configuration
Click Configuration -  Click Generate Content - Click Recipe - Click Generate
    So now we have 50 recipe nodes 

Click Content 
Under Content Type: Recipe - Click Filter 
   We can see lot of content 

If we click on any one of these, we cam see the content and in the down we can see tags from food sensitivities vocabulary 
    Now if we click on Dairy free, we can see a page with all of contents listed on it that uses Dairy free term. This is term page and since term is an entity, it can also be modified 

Click Structure - Click Taxonomy - Click List terms under Food Sensitivities 
    Now we looking at the terms for food sensitivities, and we can see at top also have Manage fields, Manage form display, Manage display tabs, so this will allows me to actually add fields to this terms and manage the way that display. For example we can add image at the top or other types of info such as external resources on this particular food sensitivity. This can be useful in setting up the structure of the site and making it really easy for user to find the types of thing that they need 
    So now we create custom content type and set that content type to reference term from vocabulary, we also looked how those terms are entities into themselves and had their own pages in drupal site 
     So we have discussed about taxonomy which is powerful resource for structuring ur site by providing categorization. Taxonomy is overall functionalities and contains vocabulary, vocabularies are specific type of categorization that might happened. For each category there are terms which are subject within each overall category, terms are drupal entities just like content nodes of end users and can be treated as such including adding custom fields and formatting. In order to use this categorization method on content we must have content type to reference the relavent vocabularies by adding reference field to the node form


Drupal Views
    Drupal views provide some filtering options, we will discuss about exposed and contextual filters which enable drupal site builders to deliver specific content to the user based on contextual information that dynamically pulled from user session or other info such as what other content might be on the page and all of this can be setup entirely through the user interface while building drupal site 

Exposed Filters
   Exposed filters are the filters that visible to the user, the user is able to make choices as to which content they see by choosing how the content is filtered. This is common user experience on shopping site, for example if we looking to purchase children clothing we might want to filter the choices of clothing to those which are appropriate size for the child 
     A great example for exposed filters can be found in drupal installation in content mgt page

Click Content 
   We can see all of the contents on the site is listed. On the top we have filters available to us to change what content displays. These are exposed filters and easy to add to our own view when u configuring ur drupal site 

1. We going to create a view of recipes and then enabling the user to choose which food sensitivity are considered in the list of recipes that we display to them 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Add view
   View name: Recipes
   View Settings - It should show content of type recipes
      Show: Content of type: Recipe
   Page Settings - we need to create a page so 
      Check create a page 
We want to create a menu link which is part of main navigation 
   Check Create a menu link
      Menu: Main navigation 
   Click Save and Edit
   Click Save

If we scrolldown to preview area we can see all of recipes are added to the site. When we goto home page and click Recipes tab we can see all recipes on the site.  But we want dropdown menu at the top that allows me to choose which recipes are actuallu seeing based on whatever food sensitivity we have 

Click Add under Filter criteria 
   Select Food sensitivities(field_food_sensitivities)
   Click Add and configure filter criteria
   Vocabulary: Food Sensitivities
   Selection type: Dropdown 
Since autocomplete would require the user to have an idea of what food sensitivities are available on the site, whereas dropdown is going to place the text into the select list that we can choose from
    Check Show hierarchy in dropdown
    Click Apply and continue

We can further adjust the operators including choosing to filter by specific term if we want to

Check Expose this filter to visitors, to allow them to change it 
    It gives specific options that actually we want to work with, in setting up how the user interact with this particular filter. The only option we are going to change is label,because we dont want machinename in label 
   Label: Food Sensitivities 
   Click Apply

Under filter criteria it is provided as exposed 
   Click Save

When we goto Recipes tab, we can see a dropdown at the top which allowing us to make a selection, if we select and click apply we can see only those recipes 

2. Another usage of exposed filter is search keyword filter, this filter enables u to create a focused search field (ie) textfield that only serach content that also needs all of the other filter parameters for ur site 

Click Add under Filter criteria - Search: key
   Select Search keywords
   Click Add and configure filter criteria 
   Check Expose this filter to visitors to allow them to change it 
   Click Apply
   Click Save

Now goto Recipes tab, we can see search keyword text field will be available in the filter and we can search the recipe based on particular keyword 

Contextual filters
     Contextual filters will look at the context of the page being viewed. Any number of elements can be considered in a contextual filters such as something about url path that the user happens to be on ur site, the type of user that actually engaging with ur site, when that user last logged in to the site if they are authenticated, when the content that they are looking was created etc
      The good example of contextual filters is with the drupal view with taxonomy, it comes with drupal when u installed and it is already setup. The lot of content is already making use of the terms that we setup in vocabulary in our taxonomy 
    On home page we have all the articles that have tags and these are terms, when we click on anyone of these terms such as baked goods and now we taken to a display with all of content with that specific term selected 
    We also added a vocabulary for ur recipes content for food sensitivities, if we click one of recipes and in that if we click Gluten free food sensitivity, we can see number of nodes that has term gluten free, some of the nodes are recipes and some are articles. At the top of page we can see paragraph and this paragraph is actually setup in taxonomy term itself. If we click edit here and we are going to edit the taxonomy term and not any of the articles listed below 
    This is the view that actually displaying and this view actually use contextual filters. The contextual filter that it using is coming from the url path for the page that we are on
     This is the url "taxonomy/term/8", here 8 is term id, every taxonomy term on ur site is going to have a unique id for that specific term 

Click Edit view when clicking pencil icon which will take me to view which available to list of view
    When we come down to preview area, we can see there are no results. But contextual filters is looking for term id 8 for the gluten free taxonomy

Preview with contextual filters: 8 
Click Update Preview
   Now we can see all of the results for that particular taxonomy term because of contextual filter in preview area. So how is the view actually making this happen  

Click Advanced
    We can see first item called Contextual Filters, the filter that has been added here is "Content: Has taxonomy term id"
    We are using contextual filter rather than adding in Filter criteria because if we add filter under filter criteria then we need to set this particular display to filter to a specific taxonomy term, if we did that then we have to create a new display for every single terms in the site which dosent make any sense and neither we want this particular display to be available for each and every taxonomy term thats on the site and we dont want to create an individual display for each and every term because it leads to lot of overhead
    So rather than adding a filter for termid 8, we add a contextual filter for "content:has taxonomy term id" 
    When we click on "content:has taxonomy term id", we have few settings like if there is no result then we dont want there to be a page avialable, so there is proably no taxonomy term 203 on our demo site because we havent build enough content yet. So if somebody wants to the url "/taxonomy/term/203" the result they would get be page not found
    Under page settings we have Path: /taxonomy/term/% where % is taken for term id
    
Header: 
   We know views are list of contents and we saw filters will show all of the contents for that specific item we are looking for
   So in this case, we goto preview area which starts with content, it wouldnt start with paragraph that comes from term page itself. So that been got in using token called "Global rendered entry" from Header area which is the taxonomy term that is being used by contextual filter
   When u click on that "Global rendered entry" from Header area, when we see replacement pattern which make use of is !1 which is nothing but term id from contextual filter 
   So back to site with Gluten free term page, where we can see term, then we see the content from specific taxonomy term and we see the results of the view. If we click another recipe, in that click another food sensitivity and we can see same flow 

Relationship in views 
   - Used to include information that is reloaded into an entity being displayed but not actually from entity being displayed. A practical reason u might be use relationship on a view would be, if we have view of a bunch of articles where displaying entire article and under each article if we want to add an about the author line, in this case we are going to include photo of recipe author on the recipe listing in the view 

Click Recipes tab
    If we look at the listing of recipes here, right now we have title, teaser and read more link. If we click one of Read more link we can look at what content exists on this particular entity. We have food sensitivity taxonomy listing, we have ingredients and we have directions for the recipe. The author info is separate entity and it is not part of this particular entity itself, the only thing that this entity contains in relation to author is who the author is and no other info is retain in the entity itself about the author. That info can be found if we edit this particular entity by

Click Edit - Under Authoring Information
    We can see which user is the author of this particular entity 

Now we are going to cleanup this look and include the photo of the author in each listing 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under  Recipes 

First we are going to change the view display rather than displaying just the teaser for the recipe, so we are changing the format from content to fields 

Click Content under Format 
Row: Fields
Click Apply
Click Apply

Now we can see only the title will be displayed in preview area, because title is the field, so now we change the title along with some customize html tags 

Click Content: Title under Format 
Under Style settings  - Check Customize field HTML
HTML element: H2
Click Apply

Now we can see all title changed to h2 heading under preview area. Now we like to add recipe description which is in body 

Click Add under Fields 
Search: body - Select Body 
Click Add and Configure fields
    Now we want to show trimmed content along with summary with 200 char to look nice and short
Select Summary or trimmed under Formatter
Trimmed limit: 200
Click Apply
    
Next we rewrite the results to strip HTML tags so that it look nice and clean
 Check Strip HTML tags under Rewrite Results
 Preserve certain tags: <br><p>
 Click Apply

Next feild we want to add is food sensitivity tags that might be on the recipes

Click Add under Format
Search: food - Select: Food sensitivities
Click Add and Configure fields 
    We create a label so that it says what it is begin shown
  Check Create a label
  Label: Food Sensitivities
  Click Apply

Now if we scrolldown to the preview here and we can see much nicer display that makes more sense for this recipes. Now we want to add the picture from the user who added the recipes. So under fields lets see what we can add in relation to the author of the node

Click Add under fields 
Search: user 
    We can see options like last comment uid who have created the comment, we have add comment link so that user can add comments, and also who authored content and who did the last revision of the content. But none of these fields are related to photo of the user. Now we search for photo, we have photo credit which is in article but we are not interest in it, we can search for picture  but nothing shows up, now we can search for image, there is an image field which appears in article and event, so none of things are going to help so the field that we are trying to show here isnt available under fields category
   This is where we need to add a relationship, what I need this particular display to do is to go out and find info about the author of the node throughout the listing of each node  
   Right now we have 2 users on our site like tc4a, burgerpop and we can see thier photos. In case if you dont have users means, goto People - Click Add user and u can create a new user

Click Advanced tab - Click Add under Relationship
Search: author - Select Content Author 
Click Add and Configure relationships
  We can change the title of this relationship, if we have multiple relationship on particular view display 
   Under Adminsitrative Title
     Administrative title: author
We also require this relationship which means anything that going to display in the view result must actually have this relationship to something else. Every node will have an author so we dont need to require this relationship because we have an author regardless. But if we have events for example that reference recipes and u only want ur view to display events that are related to recipe then we require this relationship 
   Click Apply

Now we can see author under relationship, now we can go back to fields and see what we can add in relation to author 

Click Add under fields 
Search: user - because we are interested in something about the user, now we have got user email, last time user logged in, we can link to user, we can find user language, username etc and even we can see user picture 
   Select: Picture under User
This is available to me because we have author relationship
   Click Add and configure field

The first option in the setting is to choose relationship that is going to pull this picture into the entity listed 
   Relationship: author
Since this is an image we can choose image style
   Image Style: Thumbnail
We could link the image to content so that it would link it to the user
   Link Image to: Content 
   Click Apply

Click Rearrange under Fields
Move Picture between title and body 
Click Apply

Click Save

We can author inside parenthesis which tells us that this field using relationship and pulling the data from different entity from the entity list 
 
Now we can see the user picture appear between title and body of recipe listings, if we click on anyone of the picture and it will take us to the user record. In summary this relationship allow you to pull data from other entities, once that might reference or other has related to the entity that u r displaying in ur view and display that data along with the result in the view itself

Advanced options in views interface
   Click Recipes tab - Click Edit view under pencil icon
    On the right we have advanced sections, we have discuss about contextual filters and relationship, we have lot more options to look at, now we look at

Exposed Form in block 
    When we goto recipes tab, we have expozed block appear at top that allow us to filter the results in the view, this is placed at top of the view but if we want to place it in a block  above External resources in right sidebar and want this block to be available to show on any page on the site, we can use exposed form in block to pull the explosed filters out of the view and place them in a block and show them anywhere we want on the site 

Click on No under Exposed form in block
Change to Yes
Click Apply

We also going to see exposed form style

Click on Settings under Exposed form style
Submit button text: Show recipes * 
Uncheck Allow people to choose the sort order
Click Apply

Click Save

Now we can see recipes tab is no longer displays at the top recipes view, so we goto block configuration find the block and place it on right sidebar 

Click Structure - Click Block layout 
Click Place block on sidebar second
Select Place block for Exposed form: recipes-page_1 
   Now we override the title
Check Override title
    Title: Find Recipes 
   We want to show on every page on the site, so
we leave the pages as not restricted under Page settings
    Click Save block

Drag Exposed form first, since we want it to first available in sidebar second 
    Click Save blocks

Now we goto recipes tab, we can see display on right side including Show Recipes button. If we goto another page like Why Tasty Cakes?, the block is still on sidebar and we can change any options and click Show recipes, it will take to recipe view only showing that particular recipes 

Next we look at more options under Advanced section of views display 

Machine name: page_1
    The machine name for view display is how drupal identify this display, just as each entity has its own id, each view display each block and each configuration element on ur site is going to have a machine name. This is also used in themeing to apply ids that none has CSS rules applied to them and also used in themeing hooks in more advanced drupal development

Use Ajax: No 
    This option is currently set to No, enabling this option in ur view meaning that more resources are required to display to ur user, this is because lot of ajax code is been loaded onto ur page when u have this enabled. It allows however is for content to change dynamically when the user provides the own feedback such as paging through the view or selecting the filter, so we dont want to reload the entire page when the user makes any click 

Query Settings: settings
    It is also one mainly to use in ur drupal site building 
Click Settings - Select Distinct
     In some instances we may endup showing multiple versions of record, distinct will help to eliminate that and to show only one version of each record. Until if u r comfortable with views dont use any of other settings under querry options

Caching: None
    It is also useful setting in ur view display, this setting will enable you to deliver cached version of the view display to users (ie) rather than running the database query we can show the user what is already loading version of page, this can speed ur performance. Enabling this however means that this display may not always show the newest content as quickly

CSS Class: None
    We can use to add a class or classes to ur view display which will then help u with styling when u working on ur theme 

We not going to use most of the advanced settings in ur view display unless u discover that u need them

Taxonomy term 
    It is an different type of entity, this field will act as an navigation for recipes based on food sensitivities and then treated like a menu and place it in one of sidebar to make easy navigation for users 

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Add view

View name: Recipe Navigation

Till now everything we have done is show content, this is type of entity we are going to show in view. But now we show Taxonomy term of type Food sensitivities because thats the only type of taxnonomy term that we want to display 
Show: Taxonomy terms of type: Food Sensitivities
   We dont want to create a page because all we need is a block in sidebar that list all of the taxonomy term and links to each one
  Check Create a block 
Under Block Settings
  Display format: Unformatted list of Fields
  Click Save and edit 

When we scrolldown we can see all taxonomy terms that are the part of food sensitivity vocabulary are listed under the recipe navigation preview area

Click Unformatted List under Format - Change to HTML List 
Click Apply - leave all settings to default
Click Apply
Click Save

Now we can see vocabularies are listed in unordered html list. Now we have created a view with different type of entity in order to create list of something on the site

Click Structure - Click Block Layout - Click Place Block in Sidebar first 
  Select Place block of Recipe Navigation 
  Click Save block

It has been added to bottom, so we drag Recipe Navigation above Tools
   Click Save block 

Now if we goto home page, we can see Recipe navigation on the side bar, clicking on any one of these will take us to taxonomy term page not to recipe view. So if we click Gluten free, we can see all content related to gluten free not just the recipes, so this includes article and also we can see the description of gluten free taxonomy term
    So this is different then choosing the food sensitivity on the right sidebar 
   Select Gluten free - Click Show recipes button
which shows only the recipes that has been tagged as gluten free and nothing else

In summary ur view need not be content views but also views displaying other entities like taxonomy term, users etc. The views we have looks similarly no matter what type of entity we want to display 

Advanced options in views configuration
Click Structure - Click View - Click Edit under Recipes
     First we look at exposed filters, these are setup under filter criteria and in the case of recipe database we setup filter for food sensitivity as well as filter for keywords 

Click Recipes tab
    The exposed filters that are avialable have been placed into a block in the sidebar, normally it will shown in the top of the recipes view. Making the selection in these fields will change this particular view and which elements to display
    We also saw contextual filters which is currently empty in our recipe view. We look at contextual filter through taxonomy term view and saw that based on the url structure, the content displayed would be the content that contains same term as the termid in the url itself

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under Taxonomy term 
    Under contectual filter we saw taxonomy termid and under page settings we have /taxonomy/term/% where % is termid

Goto Recipes tab - Click Dairy fee under Recipe Navigation 
   We can see url has termid in it and based on the contextual filter the content that displays below is only content that contains related termid

Click Structure - Click Views - Click Edit under Recipes
    We also look at relationship, specifically we created a relationship concept to the author entity that is tied to specific recipe so that we would able to show the picture of the author and recipe teaser in the recipe view 

Goto Recipe tab - Select Gluten free under Food Sensitivity - Click Show Recipes
   Now we can see all of the recipes with author picture in these recipes. With all of these advanced configuration settings available inur views UI, views UI is extremely powerful this is with lot of site building work can be done without touching the code 

User Management
    The way that drupal handles the user is one of the features that makes drupal as a powerful CMS. User roles and permission can be finegrained as u want, making it possible to isolate user activity on the site in very unique ways. Drupal site builders frequently use this level of control to establish complex workflows for content mgt on their sites 
    By default, drupal comes with 3 user roles 
1. Anonynmous which is the user that not logged into the site 
2. Authenticated user, this is the user who logged into the site with username and password. Authenticated users not necessarily have any permissions, its entirely upto u what authenticated users able to do on ur site
3. Administrator, this is site admin with permission to do almost everything on the site, the role has security implication that only given to truly trusted users 
    Now I have logged in as full administrator, I have access to every configuration element of the site. There is also a separate user comes with drupal installation, that isnt actually a user role but it is special user called user1 
   User1 is basically root user on ur site, it is the first user thats created when u install drupal and truly powerful user. Ideally we will never use user1 account to manage ur site. The first thing that we should do when working on site is to create new user for urself and assign that user to administrator role and log out off from user1 account and login to ur personal account

User creation and management
    The first thing to establish on ur site is how ur user accounts are created

Click Configuration - Click Account Settings
    Here we will determine the default user behaviour including what happen when someOne tries to create a user account 

Contact settings:
   The first option is whether or not there is personal contact form on the user page. This would be appropriate for community site but may not appropriate for the site where we dont want people to be directly contacting those individuals on the site, for example company profile

We can also set rolename for 2 of default user types on ur site, Anonymous which means non authenticated users, so we can change to public or guest etc. We can also change which user role is administrator role, so if we have multiple type of users on ur site, we might choose different role for the admin role

Registration and Cancellation
    The next option is who can create accounts, for example can ur site visitors create an account or request account creation by themselves or do they need to contact someone or how they can create by sometype of administrator. We can also determine whether or not visitors can request account but then require administrator approval before those accounts are actually enabled and then user can login

Require email verificatiob when visitor creates an account
     This will cause the site to send out an email when user tries to setup an account to the email address the user attempt to use. The user have to check their email and click on the link that they received in that email to confirm that there is truly their email account. So this provides a level of security and also provides some annoying to the user 

Enable password strength indicator
    This will tell the user how strong or week the password that they are planning to use actually is. It will forces them to think more carefully about what they going to put in as passwords. We can use some contributed modules to force some strong password and give password policies to ur site 

When cancelling a user account?
     We can also choose what happens when user account is cancelled, we dont tend to cancel user account rather we can block them

Emails
    Next section controls the emails that are sent when various actions take place with user account creation. Most of these have to do with whether or not this user is able to create the account on their own or what kinds of approval its required in order for that account to become an actual user account. This is where we can setup the emails that would be sent and what those emails look like 
   Two important automated emails that in here regardless of how ur user accounts are created are 
1. Account activation which is the email that send when user account is created even if a user account is created by certain administrator 
2. Password recovery so what happens when user forgets the password and needs to click on forgot password link in order to get a new one 

Click Save settings

Once account setting behaviour are established its time to create a couple of users on ur site. As we discussed the first user that you should create if u havent already, is the administrator user account for urself so that we are not continuing to configure the site as user1 

Click People
   we can see list of users on the site, there is only 1 user the first user that was created during site installation which is user1. Now we add a user 

Click Add user 

Email address: senthil@example.com
Username: senthil
Password: password
Confirm password: password
Roles: Administrator 
Click Create new account

Now when we goto People link, we can see that user senthil is never logged into the site. So we logout of the site as user1 (ie) tc4a and now we logged in as senthil, so interface will look exactly the same because this user account is an adminsitrator user account but we dont have root level permissions and this user is not powerful user on this site, so this user dosent have same level of security risk like user1 account 

Next we are going to create user account for anyone who is going to help with content on this site. For now we simply create one authenticated user that we can test the permission and see how the site works with different type of users 

Click People - Click Add User 
Email address: senthil_auth@example.com
Username: senthil_auth
Password: password
Confirm Password: password
Roles: Authenticated user - any user will have auth role
Click Create new account

Now we goto People tab, we can see 3 users that we have along with the roles assigned to each user. Now we are going to block user1 (ie) tc4a doing this user1 account is no longer available, nothing else changed the account still exist on the site and all of the content that the user created is also still present on the site so only difference is they cant login until they are no longer blocked 

Select tc4a
With Selection: Block the selected users
Click Apply

Now in new browser, login as authenticated user 
username: senthil_auth
Password: password 

Since authenticated user dosent have that much in the way of permission, the interface didnt change much at all, the only changes that took place will be login box run away and in the top right corner we have My account and Logout link

Click My Account link - Click Edit and change information if we want to, since we dont have that much info we cannot change the user role so all will be authenticated user until administrator makes changes 

Now we covered account settings under configuration where the default behaviours on the user accounts can be predefined, this includes automatic email messages that might be send when a user tries to create the account. We also created 2 new users (ie) administrator user and basic authenticated user

Custom user roles and permissions
Click People
     We can see all list of users. In the People tab we have Roles tab 

Click Roles
    We can see 4 roles that comes with drupal installation (ie) anonymous user, authenticated user and administrator, content editor. We can setpup any user role you can think off and use that to set any kind of workflow that u might need on ur site. For example if we have RSS feed that feeds content to facebook, u might have user role which has only 1 permission which is to determine whether or not content goes to facebook 
    In the case of this site we want to have recipe contributor role for users to add recipes and edit their own recipes but cant touch other peoples recipes or do anything else on the site

Click Add role 
Role name: Recipe Contributor
Click Save

We can see recipe contributor exists as one of role in our site. In order for this role to be useful we need to work with permissions for the user roles. We can do in 2 places
  1. Click Edit Permissions under Operations of Recipe Contributor  
   This will show all the permissions available with only 1 category to which we can set those permissions whether or not the permission is available to recipe contributor role
  2. Permissions tab under People tab
    This shows all the permissions available on the site with little checkboxes for every user role on our site. 
    As a warning if u have lot of user roles on ur site and lot of different modules are enabled, this can be incredibly intense page to load. The database query along will potentially cause ur site to freeze out and will be a huge performance issues
    There are contrib modules that we can use to make this little bit more manageable if we get into such situation. Since we have only 4 users roles here and not many modules we go over and use this page and see how permissions are applied to different user roles
     The administrator column here is completely grade out because the administrator user role which has permission to do everything on the site. Recipe Contributor role also has whatever authenticated user is capable of doing because any user that logged into ur site is authenticated user. We dont need to add permission for recipe contributor to post comments because authenticated user is able to post comments 
      The only permission right now we are interested is permission to add recipe content and edit ur own recipe content.

Scroll down to Node and we can see each content type has bunch of permission associated with it, so basic page content type has create new content, delete any content, delete own content etc so there are lot of different category of permissions for each content type. The difference between edit,delete any content and edit,delete own content is whether or not the content is the content that specific user created it
   We want the recipe contributor to create new content, we dont them to delete any content as well as their own content, we dont want them to delete any revisions, edit any content because we dont them to edit other people recipes, but we do want them to edit their own content. They can also view revisions but not allow to revert revisions because they want to see what changes admin made to their recipe

Select Recipe: Create new content
       Recipe: Edit own content
       Recipe: View revisions

Click Save Permissions 

Now we need to create a user who is recipe contributor 

Click List under People - Click Add User

Email address: senthil_recipe@example.com
Username: senthil_recipe
Password: password
Roles: Recipe contributor along with auth user
Click Create new account

So we discussed how to create a custom user role and how to set permission on that user role

Strategies for Checking permission
     Now we discuss strategies for checking permissions and making sure that interface  works as expected for different types of users 

2 ways to check the permissions   
    1. Open another browser and login into other browser as a user with the roles that u want to test
    In this case we are in chrome logged in as administrator, we can move to another browser and login as recipe contributor 

Username: senthil_recipe
Password: password

Now we can go through the process of testing this particular user role by making sure that the tools we need are actually here. The only thing that this particular user role is able to do is add recipe or manage existing recipe that this user has created 

Click Add Content under Tools

Dish name: Gluten free Pumpkin Donuts
Food sensitivities: select all options
Ingredients: pumpkin, sugar, egg 
Directions: some dummy text
Click Save 

So we can edit the recipe as well as we can add another recipe as the way we expect for recipe contributor. This can be pretty difficult to test all of user roles and their permissions that u have setup for each user role, because it means login, logout and again login, logout specifically if u have multiple users 
   Much easier way we can do this by using contrib module called Masquerade which allows u to temporaily pretend to be another user where still logged into the site as urself 

Download masquerade 8.x-2.x-dev from drupal.org
Extract and paste into tc4a/modules folder
Click Extend  
Enable and Install masquerade module

Masquerade module has nice little block that we can place on our site and we can use this block to quickly masquerade as other user 

Click Structure - Click Block Layout 
Click Place block of Sidebar first
Select Masquerade - Click Place Block 
   We will restirct this block to admin user role because only admin user role should be able to masquerade other users 
Under Roles - Check Administrator
Click Save Block 

When we go to the site we can see Masquerade block on sidebar where it allows to find user and switch what user we are using to look at the site 

Masquerade: senthil_recipe
Click Swicth

Now we looking at the site as senthil_recipe that particular user, this is very handy and allow me to test the functionality without having 2 browser open, we can very qucikly masquerade as other user and checks the site. When we are done as senthil_recipe user, on the top we have Unmasquerde link which will switch back to viewing site as initial user 

So till now we discuss drupal users, roles and permissions, drupal comes with 4 types of users 3 roles and user1, these roles include anonymous user, auth user and administrator. We can create our own roles and fine grained permission to these roles based on the workflows u need in ur site 


Drupal Themeing
     Theme would be ur visual display of ur site, in the case of our demo site, we have blue bar on the top, the way that the primary links are displayed in these tabs, the way that sidebars and content area are displayed 
    Theme is a file or a collection of templates files, configuration files and asset files (JavaScript, CSS, images, fonts) which together determine the look and feel of a site. A theme contains elements such as the header, icons, block layout, etc.
     Themes however are much more about CSS, they are everything about the front end presentation of ur drupal site which includes JS and the template that renders content on ur site. Template exists not only for the overall page layout but also for content area itself or for primary menu or even for the block. Theme also includes regions and regions are where the blocks are placed 

     Now we are going to enable couple of contributed drupal theme in order to change the overall look of our site, we will put 2 themes from drupal.org like Insha and Space. Insha is the theme that going to be responsive and mobile friendly, it also comes with HTML5 and CSS3 

Download Zen modules - Paste inside tc4a/themes folder of our project
   Now we can see the files available in themes folder, the configuration file in our theme are yml file and page layouts are done using files inside templates folder which are twig file. CSS in case of space theme is done using SASS and its going to have its own file as well 
    Themes can be enabled just like modules, but it happens under Appearance section of site management

Click Appearance 
    We can all installed themes and in the down we have uninstalled themes, these are additional themes that are available to our site and can be installed and configured as the theme thats being used on the site 

Click Install and set as default of Zen 

Now we can check the different theme of our site, but right now this may not look exactly as we want since elements are displaying at top locations

Now we are going to adjust theme settings and block layout for the contributed themes that we have enabled on our site so we get better site presentation with these installed themes 


Drupal with Composer

Installation

If we get any SSL certificate error 

C:\Users\USERNAME\AppData\Roaming\Composer\config.json

to this:

{
    "config": {
        "disable-tls": true,
        "secure-http": false
    },
    "repositories": [
        {
            "type": "composer",
            "url": "http://repo.packagist.org"
        }
    ]
}

2. https://ostraining.com/blog/drupal/drupal-xampp-curl-error-60/

Drupal with Composer
    Composer is a tool for dependency managemebt in PHP. It allows you to declare the libraries ur project depends on and it will install them for you

Module M - XYZ Library - ABC Library 
    Consider a scenario where we have to download or enable a module called Module M  for a website, this Module M is dependent on XYZ library and this library is dependent on another library called ABC. If we want to download this module and make it work then we have few ways to do it 
  1. First we have to download the module from drupal.org, it can be tar or zip file, since this module needs other libraries we cant directly enable this module, we have to download xyz library and put it in vendor/library folder, then again we have to download ABC library and put it in vendor/library folder and finally we will enable the module
    But using composer it will save lot of time, since composer is dependency mgt tool so it will evaluate whether that module is dependent on any library, so it will download xyz and then abc libraries


Installation
1. Create drupal project using composer

xampp/htdocs>composer create-project drupal/recommended-project myproject 

drupal/recommended-project will downloads the stable drupal version which is 9.4.8 in my case 

It will download all packages, so it will evaluate what all is needed for basic drupal setup

2. Goto myproject folder
myproject> ls
   So all libraries should be inside vendor folder. Normally composer will download project setup inside web folder, but if we want to download setup in other folder, so we dont want to download anything while creating project, so we tell composer not to download the libraries, it simply creates composer.lock and json file other things we have to do it 

>composer create-project --no-install drupal/recommended-project myplainproject
    It will create only composer.lock and composer.json after that we can setup the project

Composer.json and Composer.lock
    So whenever we download any project based on composer it will come with 2 files 
    Composer.json is the file which list basic information about the project like name, description, package dependency and what all the dependencies are required for running to setting up this project 
    Composer.lock file is for maintaining the locked version of all the packages that required in the composer.json file    

2. Run http://localhost:8012/myproject - Click Web
      Now u can install the project 

What is Drush?
     It is called Drupal shell which provide CLI for drupal, shell is a way to provide a command line interface for ur server that will give text commands to accomplish tasks rather than using user interface by clicking around 
    It is not actually a module that you download and install inside ur drupal site because this is providing CLI, so this is a project you need to download and install on ur computer 

1. Goto XAMP folder

C:\xampp>composer    - check composer is there

C:\xampp>composer global require drush/drush:dev-master  - Install drush

C:\xampp>drush status

Set the path in env variable

path    C:\Users\senthil.kumart\AppData\Roaming          \Composer\vendor\drush\drush

Webform in Drupal - Create project demo
     The Webform module allows you to build any type of form to collect any type of data, which can be submitted to any application or system.

1. Download webform module(webform-6.1.x-dev) from https://www.drupal.org/project/webform and put inside C:\xampp\htdocs\demo\modules folder
   Or use composer to download is
>composer require drupal/webform

2. Next module we download is Token, Token API is part of Drupal core but the token module gives u nice UI for browsing available tokens. 
  https://www.drupal.org/project/token
Tokens are little placeholders that you can place into text which then Drupal will render and replace with the token you have specified 

3. Click Extend - Search for Webform, WebformUI Token - Click Install 
    Webform uses a bunch of external libraries to add extra functionality

Click Structure - Click WebForms - Click Configuration - Click Libraries 
   We can see all of external libraries and we can see most of them are switched on and if we dont want to use a particular external library we can simply uncheck the checkbox and click on Save
    If we scroll up we can see message which tells how to download the libraries goes, by default the libraries are automatically loaded from CDN but it is recommended to download them into Drupal libraries directory. Library directory in drupal is used to share external libraries across multiple modules so we have only one version of library instead of having a version of library in different modules
     Webform gives drush commands to download and install these libraries 
   1. webform-libraries-make or webform-libraries-composer, these commands will create a make file or composer.json file with all of the libraries in them
   2. webform-libraries-download, this will simply download all of the libraries and extract them into ur libraries directory 
   3. webform-composer-update, this will modify  the composer file in ur Drupal installation with all of the libraries 

C:\xampp\htdocs\demo>drush

C:\xampp\htdocs\demo>drush webform:libraries:download
    Now in htdocs/demo/web/libraries we can see all libraries have downloaded 

or download libraries.zip and extract into demo/ folder. 


Now we are ready to create webform

1. Click Structure - Click Webforms - Click Add Webform

Title: Request Callback 
Click Save

2. Now we attach fields or elements to webforms like textfield for name, telephone elt for phone and textarea for details 

Click Add Element
Click Add Element for Text field 
     Title: Name
     Under Form Validation Check Required checkbox
     Click Save

Click Add Element
Click Add Element for Telephone
     Title: Phone
     Under Form Validation Check Required checkbox
     Click Save

Click Add Element
Click Add Element for Textarea
     Title: Details
     Under Element Description
        Description: Please describe your current business
     Under Form Validation Check Required checkbox
     Click Save

Now on Source tab, we can view the yml version of the form because the form is stored in yml markup, its not stored in database its actually stored as yaml markup. We can modify the yaml directly from here, so if we want to create another 2 phone element we can just copy and paste and change the key 

phone_1:
  '#type': tel
  '#title': Phone1
  '#required': true
phone_2:
  '#type': tel
  '#title': Phone2
  '#required': true

Click Save and goto Elements tab we can see 2 new elements. So for some reason if we want to create 10 text fields we can easily do it through the source tab instead of manually using UI 

3. If we want to view actual form, we can go for View tab
    When we enter some name, phone and details and we can submit the form 

4. During software building process we wont be filling out the form a lot, so we can use Test tab and all it does is, it prepopulates the form with test data and everytime we click on it, it populates with some other test data 

5. After receiving few submissions, if we want to see all of the submissions, click Result tab we can see all of ur submissions 
   If we want to download all of the submission in CSV format by going to Download tab and then click on download 
   If we want to clear all submissions, we can do so by using Clear tab and click Clear button 

Create Conditional elements
    A lot of form builders have the ability to conditionally show or hide elements, this is useful if you want to only display an element, lets say a specific radio button or a drop-down has been selected, webform have this capability
    Now we create a new element called preferred contact method which is a drop-down list with 2 options email and phone. When a user selects email then an email element will be displayed or if they select phone then a phone element will be displayed

1. In same Request callback webform, click Add element
     - Click Add Element under Select 
        Title: Preferred Contact Method
     - Under Element Options
Option Value               Option Text
  email                      Email
  phone                      Phone
     - Under Form Validation Check Required checkbox
     - Click Save

2. Drag Preferred Contact Method element below Name element
   Click Save elements 

If we goto View tab, we can see basic drop-down with email and phone options

3. Now we add conditional logic to phone element so that it only displayed if we select phone 

Click Build tab
Click Edit under Phone element 
Click on Conditions tab
    - Under State select visible 
    - If: All
        Preferred Contact Method  Select:Value is 
                                          phone
Click Save
Click Save Elements

So logic here is the state is visible if all of the following is met (ie) preferred contact method value is phone 
    If we goto view tab, we can see phone element is not visible and then if we select phone, the phone elt will be visible 

4. Now we create new email element,so that when user selects the email they can enter the email address 

Click Build tab
Click Add Element
    - Click Add Element under Email
        Title: Email
        Under Form Validation Check Required checkbox
    - Click Conditions tab  
        - Under State select visible 
        - If: All
        Preferred Contact Method  Select:Value is 
                                          email
Click Save
- Move email element below phone element
Click Save Elements


Create Multistep Wizard
    As we add more elements the size of the form will naturally grows and it is annoying to see single page form with lot of elements and in webform we have ability to create pages or multistep wizard. 
    So we create 2 pages in our form, the first one is called contact details and that will have name and preferred contact method and a second page is called company details which will have the details elements 

1. Click Build tab - Click Add Page 
          Title: Contact Details
   Click Save

2. Click Add Page 
          Title: Company Details
   Click Save

3. Now move Contact Details on top and move Name, Preferred Contact Method, Phone, Email under Contact Details and Details under Company Details 
     Click Save Elements

4. If we goto View tab, we can see a progress bar which tells which page we are in and other page information 
    Now we can enter some info in the form and enter submit 

5. Now to modify the progress bar, we can 
click Settings - Click Form - Click Wizard Settings
   - check Show Wizard Progress page, Show Wizard Progress percentage 
Click Save

Now if we goto View tab, we can see which page we are in and if we where fill first page we can see 50% through the form

6. Now eventhough we are in first page or second page the url dosent change depending on which page you are on, which is problem if we want ot track the progress using some type of analytic tool such as Google Analytics 

click Settings - Click Form - Under Wizard settings
  Select Page name(?page=contact) under Track wizard in the URl by 
  Click Save

Now if we click View tab, and give some values and click Next then it adds some parameter in url which page and it matches the page key 

7. Now if we want to change Next button

click Build - Click Edit on specific page u want to change the button 
    Under Page Settings 
       Next Page Button Label: Go to Next Page
    Click Save

Now if we click View tab, we can see label of button is changed 

8. Next we can make your forms easier to fill out (ie) floating fields from left to right so webform makes easy to float elements around in the form

Now we delete the Name element and we add 2 more elements firstname and lastname and then we will float each element next to each other
   - Click Delete under Name field
   - Click Add Elements under Contact Details
          Click Add Elements of Text field
          Title: First name
          Under Form Validation Check Required checkbox
          Click Save
   - Click Add Elements under Contact Details
          Click Add Elements of Text field
          Title: Last name
          Under Form Validation Check Required checkbox
          Click Save
   - Drag and move firstname and lastname below Contact Details 
   Now if we goto View tab, we can see firstname and lastname text fields

8. Now we make both text fields to float each other

- Click Build - Click Add Layout
     Key: full_name
     Click Save
- Move full_name at top below Contact Details and indent ur First name and Last name fields
- Click Save Elements

Now goto View tab, we can see both the elements are floated next to each other 

- If we want to change the width of each element 
     Click Edit on First Name
     Change value of  Flex: 2  under Flexbox item
     Click Save

     Click Edit on Last Name
     Change value of  Flex: 5 under Flexbox item
     Click Save
- Click Save Elements

Now goto View tab, we can see width of both elements are changed 

Create List Options
     Webforms provide the way to create predefined options 

Click Structures - Click Webforms - Click Options 

We can see list of predefined options like days, months, languages, country etc that we get when we install webform. We can define these options and reuse them in radio buttons or checkboxes, select options when needed. We can edit these options when needed by clicking Edit button 

1. Now we create our own options

- Click Add Options
      Label: Softwares
Option Value               Option Text
 java                         Java
 j2ee                         J2EE
 j2me                         J2ME
      Click Save 

2. Click Forms - Click Build 
   Click Add Elements under Company Details
   Click Add Element under Select
        Title: Softwares
Instead of defining the options, we can select
        Options: Software
        Check Requried
        Click Save
   Drag and move Software under Company Details
   Click Save Elements

Now goto Test tab and we can see the Software options. The advantage of using predefined options if we have multiple forms using the same options then adding the options in easy, we dont have to manually go through each individual form 

Sending email using Webform
    Here we send 2 emails, first one will be to sales dept because this is request a callback form, somebody wants to be called back or contacted so when a user fills out this form and email will sent to sales dept. Second email will be a confirmation email but it will only be sent if the user has supplied an email, because a user can give a phone number or email so we not guaranteed an email address all the time, so confirmation email will be a conditional email 

1. Install maillog module which logs emails, but it still send the email. We can see only developer realease 
    - Download maillog-8.x-1.x-dev, token-8.x-1.11 inside modules folder
    - Click Extend - Install maillog and token modules

2. Click Configuration - Click Maillog Settings
   - Uncheck "Allow the emails to be sent" because we dont want to accidently send emails in dev env
   - Uncheck "Display emails on page" because it takes half page to display the text of email
   - Click Save configuration 
 
3. Click Structure - Click Webforms - Click Settings under Request a Callback form Build button- Click Emails/Handlers - Click Add Email

1. First we send mail to sales dept
      Title: Sales Department 
      To email:
         Select: Custom to email address
                 sales@example.com

In message area we can modify subject and body, we can change the subject so that we can have firstname and lastname in subject and we can do this using token
   - Click Browse Available Tokens (if u dont have this link make sure token module is installed)
   - Click Webform Submissions 
          We can see [webform_submission:values:?], this is wildcard token and we can replace ? with element key so that element value will be rendered 
   - Under Subject: Select custom subject
      RAC from [webform_submission:values:first_name] [webform_submission:values:last_name]
   - Under Body: Select custom body 
       - Click Source
        Paste the default body - again click Source
     
Now [webform_submission:values] token which will display all of the values and we can control which values get added to this token by 
     - Click Included Email values
We can simply uncheck which values we dont want to pass to that token, in our case we need all but there are situation where we have some private info not be displayed in the form, so we can uncheck it

Please contact Customer,
Submitted on [webform_submission:created]
Submitted by: [webform_submission:user]
Submitted values are:
[webform_submission:values]

     - Click Save

2. Goto Test tab, we can click next page and finally click Submit button. Now it will display the message that sending of email message is disabled by maillog

3. To check the logged email 

Click Reports - Click Maillog 

We can see list of email when we click on the subject we can see the full body of the email 

4. Now we create confirmation email 

Click Structure - Click Webforms - Click Settings under Request a Callback form Build button- Click Emails/Handlers - Click Add Email

Title: Confirmation email
Send to:
    To mail:  select Email under Elements
Subject:
    Select Custom Subject: Thanks for Contacting us
Body:
    Select Custom Body: Click Source - Paste default body 
   
Thanks [webform_submission:values:first_name],
Submitted on [webform_submission:created]
Submitted by: [webform_submission:user]
Submitted values are:
[webform_submission:values]   

- Goto Conditions tab
     Enabled   If: All of the following is met
                  Email            Filled
Click Save
Click Save Handlers

- Goto Test tab, fill all details and click submit

- Goto Click Reports - Click Maillog 
     Now we can see 2 emails one is confirmation and another one sent to sales dept, if we click confirmation emails we can see all info displayed


Creating Confirmation Page

1. Click Structure - Click Webforms - Click Settings under Request a Callback form Build button- Click Confirmation
     From here we can configure the confirmation type, we will leave it as page but we can set as inline, message, modal, url, url with message. Page is most common one, but if we want to redirect user to 3rd party website then we can use URL option

Confirmation title: Request a callback has been submitted

Confirmation message:
     Thanks [webform_submission:values:first_name],
     One of our sales reps will be in contact shortly. 

Confirmation Back Link
   Label: Back to request a callback form 

Click Save

2. Goto Test tab, fill all details, click on submit, we get confirmation page 
   Now in url we can see the tokens will be displayed, but we dont want to display

Click Settings - Click Confirmation - check "Exclude token from Confirmation URL"

Click Save

Goto Test tab, fill all details, click on submit, we get confirmation page, but now we cant see the token parameter in URL and the token will not rendered properly because we need those tokens. So if we are going to add tokens to confirmation message we need to make sure "Exclude token from Confirmation URL" is unchecked 

Allow Draft Submission
     Now we allow users to save drafts, consider we fill out form with five pages, it will nice to stop halfway and save it as a draft and come back and finish it later 

1. Click Stucture - Click Webforms - Click Settings under Build for Request a Callback - Click Submissions
     - Check Authenticated and Anonymous user 
     - Check Allow users to save multiple drafts
     - Check Automatically save as draft when paging, previewing
under Submission Draft Settings 
     - Draft Saved Message
Submission saved. You may return to this form later and it will restore the current values
Please note: Your draft submission will be deleted in 3 days
     - Select Draft under Automatically Purge of Submission Purge Settings
      Days to retain submission: 3

-Click Save

2. Now we can see draft button in our callback form, now we give just firstname and lastname, then click Save Draft button, we can see the draft message 
     Now remove ?page=contact_detail and refresh the page we can see message that draft is pending and when we click on "Load your pending draft" we can see the draft will be loaded because we have only one 
      But we have checked the checkbox which allows users to have multiple drafts, so we go back to form and enter firstname, lastname and select preferred contact method, then click Save Draft button, it will say display the draft message
      Now when we refresh the page, we can click "View your pending drafts", we can see a table with all drafts, if we want to use specific drafts we can click on anyone of link 

3. In case if we want to customize the table 

Under Settings - Under Submission - Under Submission User Settings  
      We just check firstname, lastname, Submission Title and uncheck IP address
     Click Save 

Now we can see the draft table will be changed

4. Now if we want to change the value of Submission title in the table

Under Settings - Under Submission -

Submission Label: [webform_submission:submitted-to] by [webform_submission:values:first_name]

Click Save

Now we can see the value for submission title in the draft table will be changed 


Displaying Form as a Block
     Now we add form as a block in the right sidebar 

1. Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Basic Page
   Title: Test page
   Url alias: /test
   Click Save 

1. Click Structure - Click Block Layout - Click Place Block of Sidebar Second 
   Search for Webform - Click Place Block 

Webform: Request a Callback 
Pages: /test
Click Save Block 
Click Save Blocks 

So when we goto our main page, we can see the form in right hand sidebar. Now we can give some values and click submit, it will go to confirmation page 

2. We may notice that when we switch pages, it refreshes the whole page to go to the next page, now we can avoid that by using AJAX setting for this form 

Click Settings on pencil icon on webform
Check Ajax checkbox under Ajax Settings 
Click Save 

Now when we fill the data and click Next page, it will reload only the form via Ajax, and finally when we click submit it redirects to confirmation page 

3. Now we dont want to redirected to a whole new page once the form has been submitted, so webform allows to display the confirmation inline 

Click Settings on pencil icon on webform
Click Confirmation 
Ckeck Inline under Confirmation type
Click Save

Now when we fill the details and click submit button, we can see it will display confirmation msg in same page 


Display Form using Webform Node
     Another way we can display forms using Webform node sub modules

1. Click Extend - Search for Webform - Select Webform node - Click Install

2. Click Structure - Click Content Types - Click Webforms 
   - Click Manage fields under Webform 

This content type has two fields, body and webform. The module implements its own field type called webform which allows to display forms on any field or entity
    So we can display a form within a block just by adding a field to a custom block type or if we want to allow editors to embed forms using the paragraphs module, then we can create a paragraph type and then attach the webform field to it 

3. Now we create 2 instances of our request a callback form, first will have email pre-populated as the preferred contact method and second one will have phone.
   So using Webform content type we can have multiple instances of one form

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Webform 
    Title: Request a Callback (Email) 
    Webform: Select Request a callback 
    Default Submission Data: preferred_contact_method: email(we can get the key from Structure - Webforms - Request a callback)
    Click Save 

So now if we scrolldown, we can see email is default preferred contact method

4. Now we create another for phone

Click Content - Click Add Content - Click Webform 
    Title: Request a Callback (Phone) 
    Webform: Select Request a callback 
    Default Submission Data: preferred_contact_method: phone
    Click Save 

So now if we scrolldown, we can see phone is default preferred contact method

5. Now we click Test tab, add two values for Request a Callback(Phone) and one value for Request a Callback(Email)

Click Content - Click Webforms - Click Request a Callback(Phone) - Click Results 
    We can see 2 submission for this one, since webform is smart enough to show the submission for that particular one 

Click Content - Click Webforms - Click Request a Callback(Email) - Click Results 
    We can see 1 submission for this one

So we could easily develop a system in Drupal where editors could create multiple webform content pages but they can only see submissions that have been entered in on specific pages

Now if we want to see all the submissions

Click Structure - Click Webforms - Click Submissions under Request a Callback 
